"People are afraid they would lose their identity and their quality of life if the monarchy disappeared," he said.
Chocolate Mint Thins (dairy-free, egg-free, nut-free, sesame-free, vegetarian and vegan)
I used the random.org website to choose my winners and then I couldn't figure out how to show that here, so you will just have to trust me!
Generally poor health outcomes—especially maternal and child mortality—are a result of various factors, including fragmentation; inequalities between the public and private health sectors regarding the availability of financial and human resources; the accessibility and delivery of health services; and a high disease burden, particularly HIV/AIDS. The government’s failure to provide effective oversight for the implementation of existing reproductive and sexual health-related laws and policies contributes to South Africa’s high and increasing maternal death rate, as does a lack of accountability for recurrent problems in the health system, including abuses committed by health personnel.
Onions (optional), 1 pc, cut into small pieces
5) Las Vegas. For years it has been luring tourists to its casinos with pictures of girls in feathered headdresses and promises that transferring our bank accounts into the slot machines will be fun! But I don’t think so. We’re downgrading Las Vegas from a vacation destination to: A Sauna With Flashing Lights. And we’re changing its name to Loss Vegas.
If you wear shoes, you know Louboutin. The suave Frenchman, celebrating 20+ years as one of the world’s leading women’s shoe designers, will have an exhibition of his work showcased at the Design Museum this month with real emphasis on Louboutin’s design process from fantasy sketch to highbrow store.
Sexual selection?
For 50 years, people have vigorously spread the promise of contraception.
Thank you for all the prayers! Within a few hours of posting my last blog entry, God provided a way for me to go to the conference... This is how I know I'm where I'm supposed to be, doing what I'm supposed to do.
From 1870-1920, our Queen City was known as the Paris of the West. Full of entertainment, commerce, and of course beer. The Germans who came to Cincinnati settled north of the canal, now Central Parkway, and the neighborhood was dubbed Over-the-Rhine. 48,000 people packed into OTR (2.5 mile area) with 75% of the population German. Of course they wanted to bring a little bit of home with them to America, so they built saloons and breweries. There were 136 saloons from the Ohio River to McMicken which allowed for the citizens of Cincinnati to drink 2.5 times the national average -- close to 40 gallons a person (Man, Woman and Child!).
And for he did the rest in wisdom far exceed,
“Why would I even try? It’s not like I can change anything!”
You could win this prize pack......
The next day, we went together to see a play with my co-worker’s extended family. Her sister had written and acted in this play about three brothers who meet their ends and exact revenge on the evil queen who killed them. It’s a kid’s play. The second play we saw was the tale of Oneri, who searches everywhere for her parents. The small theater was packed! The costumes were bright and beautiful, and I got my picture taken with the cast! I slept in Daejon that night after a game of pool with kun-heung and chagun-heung. The next day, the family made us a wonderful breakfast and I set out by train to Seoul to meet with my friends from St. Louis, Baltimore and Houston.
But I heard his voice again. "Keep your eyes straight ahead. Don't look down...."
Last but not least the food will be serve to the guests.
The Antrim Guardian is owned by Alpha Newspapers, which is in turn owned by the wealthy, (lands and titles) Lord Kilclooney, former Unionist politician John Taylor. So it's not at all surprising that they will print LIES about the British National Party!
Well done hun! If you could e-mail me at christmascrafting@hotmail.co.uk and I will pass your details onto Robyn's Fetish and they will be in touch about claiming your prize!
I grew up with parents that were apart of many churches. They we’re what you could call church planters. People that go and help start a church in a new area and then when it is basically established, they take off and go help the next church launch. It made for some interesting stories but, as a kid at the time I had no idea what all went into starting a church. It just seemed like fun. One church would meet in someones home in downtown Long Beach. Another in a movie theater in Fountain Valley. Then a shopping center in another part of the Los Angeles area. Then, there was always food. I mean you cant have a church gathering and not have the good ‘ol Pot Luck. Church as a kid was fun. Church as the worship pastors kid was fun. Shoot, I started playing tambourine and shakers for the sunday morning services when I was around 7 or 8yrs old.
Leaning against a Mercedes
Canada has long used military tactics against us to accomplish its goal of taking our land and resources. In the beginning, it was blankets filled with small pox and scalping laws. Even the treaty "negotiations" consisted of brutal force to sign treaties:
Roger Goodell has earned his hood pass
"Um. What's all that shit for?"
Cut off the tips from the chicken wings, clean them under running water and pat dry as much as possible. Transfer to a large bowl.
And all the times it left me stranded thumbing all over town
Over the years she spent tending to the needs of those who were dying, Bronnie’s life was transformed. Later, she wrote an Internet blog about the most common regrets expressed to her by the people she had cared for. The article, also called The Top Five Regrets of the Dying, gained so much momentum that it was read by more than three million people around the globe in its first year. At the requests of many, Bronnie now shares her own personal story.
The key section of the Florida law states: “A person who is not engaged in an unlawful activity and who is attacked in any other place where he or she has a right to be has no duty to retreat and has the right to stand his or her ground and meet force with force, including deadly force if he or she reasonably believes it is necessary to do so to prevent death or great bodily harm to himself or herself or another or to prevent the commission of a forcible felony.”
Where the rays of the sun
Eric Johnson ... Jake Findley
John Dewey writes in “My Pedagogic Creed” about education and what it is. He believes that all education stems from an individual interacting socially with the community. This begins the day the child is born and this interaction molds and develops the character and habits of the child as he grows. Through this the child gains the benefit of sharing in the intellectual and moral resources that his community has gained through the ages. This process is important and formal education will only help guide it in a certain direction and not replace it.
So dark, so scarred; what if they knew…….
I am wise, I am a fool,
In reality, The Montanas never realised their potential either at home or abroad. They spent some time in America trying to crack the lucrative British Invasion market, issuing a total of eight singles there as well to no avail, although the rather good "You've Got To Be Loved" managed to climb to number 58 on the Billboard Charts. By 1969 both UK and US labels had clearly had enough, although the band carried on performing well into the seventies.
'With a little effort, you can be anything you want.'
We can give Neil the chance to live his life in a meaningful way. We can give Neil the same benefits other cerebral palsy patients have enjoyed from this stem cell treatment.
Third, do not scrimp on the wax. Antique furniture is expensive, so you should only complement it with top quality products, otherwise, you’ll be defeating the purpose. There are high quality beeswax that may be imported from England. However, if you don’t have enough money to import good wax, just wipe the arm chair with a cotton cloth.
Somewhere in the mist of the romance associated with vampires and their undying love, we choose to forget that everything about them is shaped to be the most deadly of predators. Everything about them, their smell, their beauty, their charm, their speed, their strength, the seductiveness is meant to draw you in for an easy kill. Because let's face it, humans would be easy prey. If they existed there would be a never-ending suicidal train of humans longing to be Vlad's Elisabata. Male and female..lol. To me it would make more sense for vampires to be dark beings. They live forever and probably within the first 100 years have had a taste of every decadence and pleasure available, only to take the next 100 years and explore what not only can be stretched, but also can be improved. Such is the case with Christian, our not so virtuous hero. He found Juliette at a rather young age and remained fascinated with her throughout her growth into womanhood. Six years is a drop in the bucket to a vampire but the patience is quite another thing altogether. It was a six year torture for the man himself of waiting for the right time to strike. For even though he knew he would eventually destroy her, the temptation she presented pushes aside all residual human emotions with the exception of possessiveness. But could he save her? Or would she become just another on his list and in his locked room?
At the time however, it became general knowledge that I "enjoyed" everyone else's "problem horses." It wasn't so much that I craved a battle every time I got on a pony (although the years 2010 and 2011 of this blog may suggest otherwise), but it infuriated me to watch people shy away from trotting their 14 year old pleasure horse (who they "raised") because trotting made "Joey-boo" (not kidding) rear sometimes.
The park, which is concrete with round copings, isn’t as large as most of the other concrete parks in the area, like Gloucester or Manchester, but it has possibly the best flow.
but it fit this theme.
It’s afflicted brilliant minds from Andy Warhol to Albert Einstein, and affects one in 100 people in the UK today.
of road construction, it now takes his family 7 hours to get to the ZZ SWI
Here's my first page:
Variations on this quote have been attributed to Disraeli, Shaw, Churchill, and Bertrand Russell.
12. Blind Vision – Tanz den Teufel (4:47)
Welcome to Joshua’s Thoughts. I’m Joshua and kudozus is my standard online handle. I’ve created this blog as a means to discuss and connect with other people on topics that my Facebook friends are tired of hearing me go on about.
Home early from Writers in order to meet the computer engineer - everything mended - then lunch and then my walk with Tess. It did strike me on the walk that the muddy puddles at the side of the lane show just as much about our wildlife as a fall of snow does. There were lots of rabbit prints and pheasant prints along the sides of the lane. There is no shortage of either around here at the moment.
- Vincent "Don D Junior" Gordon: trombone
Brooks is cast as a vamp, a circus artiste / high-diver known as Marie (Mam’selle Godiva). McLaglen and Armstrong, each suitors, offer a towel and more. 'Mlle Godiva' handles each with Lulu-like aplomb.
Our immediate response was that if the insured experiences a subsequent, separate loss, then the full replacement cost of the damaged property should be paid.
I can’t really trust others.
within my dreams.
As a possible variation, you could grill the corn in the husks along with the peppers. This would add a more robust grill flavor to the dish. I had planned to do this when I started. However, I was having problems with my grill starting. So I resorted to cooking the corn on the stove and not roasting the peppers at all. Either way, I think it is a great dish.
BLITZER: Go ahead, quickly.
Without missing a beat he said, “I guess some goats are more traditional than others.”
It was a jolt to drive by there a few minutes ago. Tonight is just the kind of beautiful, chilly night when our little urban tribe would converge on the Wine Bar’s west-facing patio, sipping tempranillo and watching the sun sink low. We’d probably build a fire…and this past winter, when we knew our ship was sinking, we’d bust up a chair or break off a few fence boards to fuel the flames—a touch of gallows humor, a dash of irreverent rule breaking to make us feel a little less impotent in the face of the destruction ahead.
Yeast nutrient. ( add as per instructions)
100. Maggie, Girl of the Streets: Stephen Crane
These little balls of yarn have been machine washed in hot water, rubbed a little to smooth the surface, and sent to Stephanie for her birthday some time ago.
PS isn't her hand writing GORGEOUS
And in the Name that is above every other names, from now on you will keep on shining.
Engineering: Steve Newman, Ken Kesey, Mountain Girl
Box of Chocolates Miller was so much fun to color! I copic colored him basically using the same colors, but opposite from each other! I made him two different sizes for different looks too!
Do not ask When
Can you remember watching a play, a ballet or an opera and suddenly the lights faded and the spotlight fell on the main character? You were dazzled at the intensity of the brightness. His or her white garments glowed like an advertisement for Drive, Dynamo or Hurricane washing powders. (Products sold in Australia). Perhaps it might have been an ad for less dynamic sounding brand names like Omo or Earth Choice. Or it might well be that another brand name Radiant would be the best description one could get for the intensity of that light.
I definitely see some connection between the colors of the signs and the colors of the planets who own those signs, are exalted there, or even debilitated (in the case of Virgo). So the planets impart their colors to the signs they are most intimately connected with could be a plausible answer on which we could figure out why each sign has its specific color.
I was a 36C. As cataloged here, I bought – at one point during pregnancy – a 40DD. Yes, I did. It may have been overkill, but probably not. And now, I measure at a 38D. I landed right in the middle.
Some wonderfully heartening - and most unexpected - news announced this morning: The Lantern has been shortlisted in the Epic Romantic Novel category for the Romantic Novelists' Association's 2012 Awards. It's up against some very strong competition so I've not a crumb of expectation of this going any further, but just as it is, this is just the spur to the confidence I needed.
How? Let me see if I can explain this still-nascent idea. (I reserve the right to completely disagree with myself later, since I'm really just thinking aloud here, writing this post instead of doing other things I should be doing...)
Oh, yes!
This week in Carrion Crown, Annie (Grift), a Dan (Sir Horace Gunderson), Toby (Solis and his eidolon Gea) and Tyler (Alexandros Callimachi) and GM Hunter embarked on the first steps of Trial of the Beast.
Autumn Makes and Does made this pretty little rangpur lime marmalade, and when I made it, it came out perfectly. It's a gorgeous marmalade in petite ratio, and her recipe totally made me feel okay about making it. I didn't want a huge batch. I ended up with three quarter pints, and one fridge container. Treasure!
Suwanee* & Prado @ 6:00 pm
You need some time to be free
I cannot throw, catch, hit, run or jump.
Gentlemen of the Press,
6 mushrooms
And yet, it's the first week of January and it feels like I should acknowledge the new year somehow ...
Consider golf: Social interaction aside, why would anyone go to a course and attempt to hit a tiny ball into a far-away hole? “If we were thinking of standards of productivity, we would just invent a machine that stands over the hole and sort of shoots the balls into the hole,” explained game designer Jane McGonigal, who studies the social and mental impact of gaming, at her South by Southwest Interactive festival keynote speech this year. “Instead, playing the game is something entirely different.”
Mainstream archeology hasn’t been exactly welcoming. Mr. Freeman says journals have rejected his papers and conferences have denied him a platform. Although he hasn’t read Canada’s Stonehenge, University of Alberta archeologist Jack Ives is familiar with Mr. Freeman’s theories. He says recent research suggests some astronomical knowledge developed in Central and South America flowed north to the plains, where it was adapted by people for their own purposes. “There is some basis for thinking there was sophisticated astronomical knowledge,” says Mr. Ives. But what exactly is manifested in the medicine wheels? “They may certainly reflect solstices and equinoxes. How much more sophisticated beyond that has been a subject of debate.” But Mr. Ives points out the terrain in question is an ancient glacial moraine, full of naturally occurring rocks. “You have to be very careful about what you line up.”
15. booksNyarn
Legal Executives
The South African government’s investigation comes just weeks after they started looking at flight costs.
*In my mind I sound like Arnold Schwarzenegger when I say that.
While the sentence seems convoluted to most people who can hear, it makes sense to Joe Lellman, an NIU senior from Buffalo Grove. He uses the sentence to show how different American Sign Language grammar is compared with spoken English.
for making me think
Mom - Happy Birthday my biggest baby.
"You do say some silly things sometimes!”
As a parent, we often believe that we need to control. Sometimes, we control because we feel out of control in other aspects of our lives, and we need to control something in order to stay in balance. But sometimes we control in an attempt to protect our children from having to endure some of the things in life we know are difficult - broken hearts, misdirected efforts, wastes of time, etc. After all, we know all of the shortcuts because we've already been through it. We know how to get through life with efficiency and expedience, in ways that will protect our own hearts from pain. And because we have learned from our own mistakes, we have a strong desire to help our children live their lives as error-free as possible. And so we try control a variety of things - TV, food, sleep times, educational choices, friends and lovers - with generally positive intent, but often negative results.
The advice from the word of God differs profoundly from the advice given by the world. So whose advice would you follow? In Psalm 118:8 we see that “It is better to trust in the Lord than to put confidence in man.”
I simply cannot say how surprised I am at how much stuff she had up there, shocked that I didn't know about it all, and disgusted at some of it. Yuck. Yet I am laughing hysterically at the same time. She shares the room with her sisters and, for the most part, does it willingly, which is great because she doesn't have a choice. But her bed is her space.
Go Snowboarding or Skiing (I Prefer Snowboarding)
- Letting go of insecurities
He doesn't directly answer her one essential question, which is: Do you think businesses should be allowed to not serve black people? Instead, he uses lots and lots of words, says he thinks racism is abhorent, that he would never support anything or anyone who is, but that, in the end, yes, the part of the civil rights law that allows black people to eat at countertops with white people is government intrusion into business.
Box Includes: Visor Clip, Car Charger (Micro USB), and documentation in English, Spanish, and French.
Still, I am reborn. I am one. But not yet finished. Not yet complete.
Nov 1 – House of Blues – Anaheim, CA (W/Cobra Starship)
The earth is the Lord’s and everything in it, the world and all who live in it; for He founded it upon the seas and established it upon the waters. Who may ascend the hill of the Lord? Who may stand in His holy place? He who has clean hands and a pure heart, who does not lift up his soul to an idol or swear by what is false. He will receive blessing from the Lord and vindication from God his savior.
The difficulty, like so many of the difficulties that beset humanity, is one of overgeneralizing a good idea. There’s no significant middle ground between food and nonfood, say, or between predator and nonpredator, and so the reactive response we’re discussing excludes the possibility of middle ground; it’s either edible (or considering you as edible), or it’s not. The more complex classifications that the reasoning mind can use, though, admit of a great deal of middle ground, and so do the equally complex relationships that develop in societies once the reasoning mind gets to work on relationships between social primates. When we have the opportunity to consider such things carefully, it’s not hard to see this, but the hardwired habit of snap judgments in binary form is always right below the surface. In most cases all it takes is a certain amount of stress to trigger it. Any kind of stress will do, and over the years, practitioners of mass thaumaturgy have gotten very good at finding ways to make people feel stressed so that the binary reaction kicks in and can be manipulated to order.
All the work, the training, the wise words, for what? To smile in the face of my brother’s killer, while you
So to put all this into one definition, we’d say an online community is:
1.PREPARE THE APPLES: Preheat the oven to 350° and line the bottom of a 9-inch cake pan with parchment paper. In a large bowl, blend the butter with the brown sugar and salt. Spread the mixture evenly in the lined cake pan. Arrange the apples wedges in the pan in 2 concentric circles.
Now for the stunner! Cult Nails Toxic Seaweed is a emerald green jelly packed full of glitter and flakies that flash red, gold, and orange. It's quite a complex lacquer! Sheer on it's own I felt layering Toxic Seaweed over a golden toned lacquer would really make the flakies pop and it really does. This is my first lacquer from Cult Nails and I'm hooked! Have you joined the Cult?
1 cup of processed rice flour
matter are plain enough. Catholics' reactions are plain enough. The
Though we are getting ahead of ourselves in this article and as to later proposed research, we believe any real student of Dr. Bob’s remarks will find that A.A.’s co-founder was still doing the daily prayer and Bible-reading, was still conducting prayer-meetings, was still going to church, was still supporting his church, was still talking about doing his Master’s will, was still emphasizing the leading of a Christian life, and was not only talking about these things throughout his A.A. years, but was urging these things on his “pigeons”—as he called the new AAs. There was no significant talk in Christian Endeavor about the Four Absolutes of the Oxford Group; of a life-changing “art” of self-examination, confession of sins to another person, conviction, and “conversion” leading to a spiritual awakening. Nor even about some of pioneer A.A.’s own favored ideas in the Book of James, including James 5:16.
We need to show the same respect for others as we wish for them to show us.
I have begun to set up at a local flea market selling my cookies already and the one question, or rather, comment, I get alot is about gluten free cookies.
I give thanks for the artists of this installation for reminding me that.
Anyone unfortunate enough to have invested a significant part of themselves in Houston sports teams should take a look at Oiler Blues by John Pirkle (Sportline Publishing, 2000). Half Price Books should still have a bunch of remaindered $5 copies for sale, so buy it there instead of Amazon.
At almost forty? Nothing. I used to dislike my ears and my forehead. My ears stuck out when I was twelve or thirteen and my forehead was too broad. With the passing of time I found out that the reason my ears stuck out was because of my ability to appreciate good music and my forehead was ample because I thought problems through.
“So will we keep dating? Maybe. Will we live together again? Maybe. Will we break up? Maybe. Will we part ways and never speak again? Maybe. Will this all get figured out and we'll live happily ever after? Maybe. Will we each meet someone else to spend the rest of our lives with? Maybe.”
Loreal Super Liner – Instant Impact Felt Liner “Black” (Guardian Pharmacy Malaysia)
There are three types more of lynxes:the Canadian lynx, the boreal lynx and the red lynx. The Canadian lynx and the red lynx aren’t in danger.
I just hope I actually finish it. I haven't decided yet how it will fasten at the front but I've been wearing it already tied with a piece of ribbon and moved on to knitting some gloves - and this is how the fancy bits NEVER get done.
Hi everyone! Let me start out by saying I am so sorry, but typepad seems to be having some technical difficulties so The Sampler has been unable to get the challenge post uploaded. Keep an eye out as I am sure it will be soon.
While my brother Terry then stood there distracted by the fact that it was daylight and he was standing, I spotted a stick with a flat end and one smaller than that nearby. Chuckling with evil intent, I ran to the turd deposit and shoved the stick under and teetered towards the car.
5. Sahar Gul is doing as well as can be expected.
Book Dimensions: 6 x 9
Happy Sunday everyone! We're off to the Noosa Harbour Markets and some more time on the beach.
The irony is that while there’s no question I’m more resourceful and frugal and self-sufficient in my new life, I actually feel like less of a feminist than ever… Instead of feeling proud of myself for all my physical accomplishments, I sometimes find myself wishing that Jake would do more manual labor for me. You know, because he’s a dude and I’m not. I sometimes find myself wanting to hole up in the house and assuage my guilt for not helping him dig a trench to China by baking him cookies, or making him a nice casserole, or some such. Suddenly, dusting the end tables doesn’t seem so bad. Betty Friedan would probably roll over in her grave.
*various breads
Cooking torrijas was an interesting experience because we were using Loli’s kitchen and supplies and we had never cooked in Spain before. Lighting the burners for example required using a lighter and putting your hand right next to where the gas came out. After several attempts I had Loli do it, instead of filling the house with gas. In addition Shannon and I had never deep-fried something the way that the Spaniards deep-fry. Therefore we added a generous amount of oil to the pan, to which Loli added two-inches-deep more of oil. Now this is what I’m calling healthy! Through the various steps we finally figured out how to make the torrijas come out well since we couldn’t soak the bread in the milk or in the batter too long, otherwise it would become too soggy and break. The best way to describe it was that there were too many cooks in the kitchen. Taking over someone else’s territory – in this case Shannon and I taking over Loli’s kitchen – caused disruption and the necessity for her to intervene. Consequently spoons with batter fell on the ground, oil spattered from the pan onto my skin and final products sometimes burned. As with many things in Spain, I’ve learned from the experience.
Back in June 2006, IPG paid under $5 million when it made its initial investment in Facebook. Facebook agreed to sell the shares to IPG in exchange for IPG agreeing to spend $10 million with Facebook for clients of its agencies.
Q: I love your book Zachary's Ball. How were the Red Sox autographs collected in the book for the First Book fundraiser? Had you ever tried collecting autographs, in person or TTM, before?
Hi. I'm not usually one to write fan letters. But I feel compelled to write one.
“Busy’ is another word for ‘asshole’. ‘Asshole’ is another word for the guy you’re dating.”
Marlis Yurkiw
Rachel Kellers is someone I’ve mentioned on Covered By The Dust before and now I am privileged to be able to introduce a piece she’s written especially for this blog. I think what she has written is succinct and enlightening, and so if you enjoy her post be sure to hit the like button or leave a comment.
The inductive argument will look like this:
These are posts that made me laugh, or made me think, or made me think I should be reading this blogger more. And hopefully they're people you're not all that familiar with yet.
Are you thinking, why is he admitting how stupid he is?
It's that time again, can't believe how quickly the monthly challenge at BunnyZoe comes around. The theme this month chosen by Dorcas is "Ribbon or Twine", I happened to have used both but you can use either and as usual will run until the second Monday in May so you have plenty of time to enter.
I like Thomas Hardy and George Eliot for their authenticity - they were actually seeing an England that has vanished. I like Stephen King for his quirky characters and Ian Rankin for his gripping story lines. I have also recently discovered Tess Gerritsen - a brilliant American crime novelist. I also like to read about the English countryside in bygone days - particularly books by the early naturalists such as Gilbert White and Richard Jefferies.
For the record, I am sooooo glad he didn't. Not because I didn't want him here (I'm human; I did), but because he only gets a very limited time each year with his family and friends in Argentina, and you know, I'm a counselor... I have coping skills.
Obama comes into power and decides to release the prisoners, so we see the doors to each of their individual cells slide open with a loud metallic bang. They walk out one by one, squinting in the light, hug each other in relief and look sadly at the door of the cell that held Hannibal. However, a fifth door is heard opening. They stop, and look around at the doorway, trying to make out who this fellow prisoner could be. A lone figure stands in the shadows and slowly emerges, one step at a time. The camera pans up to reveal....
So the question I have to ask is this….when does confidence become arrogance?
The Stars” in the gathering night.
The researcher of elites, one guide advises, needs many of the characteristics of the social climber: ‘everyone who might possibly know someone, must be contacted and asked if they will give introductions, vouch for one, and otherwise help one’s enterprise.’ (Non-corporate) Brits would undoubtedly cringe at my naked opportunism—I do cringe inwardly, alas, and often wimp out of asking directly—but people in India are fortunately more sympathetic, and friends, acquaintances, and interviewees have often been very helpful. Let’s face it: all elites of all societies operate on this principle, this one just more unabashedly than most.
Ann Holland made the controversial remarks during a Tameside council meeting – where £22m cuts were agreed.
My husband! He doesn't read novels only on a rare occasion.
Europe has successfully took the public’s eye off of their economic crisis by using the Arab Spring wisely. Europe has also engineered Israelli operations to destabilize the Iranian nuclear program and they have succeeded. The GI files also mentioned that the EU were battling each other over the future of the Euro currency. They were facing options whether to continue to support Greece or ditch them and if they chose to ditch them then the Euro will dive down and regional investors will pull out and the economy will seriously crumble. The EU also were ticked off on Germany for a while because the only ones benefitting from the EU crisis was Germany. Are you still surprised that Europe has been so negative in the media against Bahrain? Well at least now you know the reason why they do their best to destroy Bahrain and support the Arab spring revolutions. If revolutions were unsupported by the international community then russia would gain everything and the middle east would lose a lot of money and so will the US.
I am sure the psychiatrist will chide me for not having friends… but I think that is just part of my personality disorder. Friendships for me are like binge drinking… I can’t have just a little relationship. It’s either all or nothing. This has certainly gotten me in trouble a time or two.
I’m sharing this art because it made me giggle. I think it is subtle and brilliant. It reminds me of something Kramer would say to Jerry in a Seinfeld episode—one of those quirky human behavior dialogs the show was so famous for. I especially love the line “I'm not sure, but I think it has something to do with art.” It speak volumes in one short sentence.
Longing in hope its resonance would ring forever and never fade from my heart.
I hope everyone's Saturdays are treating them well?
The more I have pondered this recently, the less plausible it seems to me that this is just an ‘accident’ of the narrative — that Solomon just happened to request a particularly handy gift, and that therefore it was necessary to tell a couple of stories just to give a proper ‘character portrait’.
Francione
“You’re still weak,” Mesdan observes. “You know how grueling the initiation is. I will not allow you to be present, let alone stand– rather, lie– vigil and wait for me to return.”
If it’s cynical to look truth in the face and exercise common sense in the affairs of life, then certainly I’m a cynic and odious if you like.’
3. Confirm Israel as the Perpetual Victim. It must reinforce the role of Israel as the only friend of the United States in the region, even the world. The “inverse victimization” of the “ever-suffering,” and “perpetually-victimized” state of Israel is a potent double psychology. What the fictitious Osama is saying is that “we” are in trouble because of Israel. The purpose is to make us even more resolute in protecting our only friend in the world.
SYLVIA- "What happened?"
In less than three seconds, water covered the entire bathroom floor–followed immediately by every towel, washcloth, bathmat etc I could find.
...I digress.
Opposing Energies: Stubbornness, narrow-mindedness, negativity, opinionated.
But I hope no one had to. I hope they could see if on my face. I hope they don’t think we only got married because it was forced on us.
The Tip Run – Johnny Mains
she began to wail in a way that i had not witnessed since she was a tiny little tyrant, screaming for the boob. and she would. not. stop.
"Crime and Punishment," by Duncan Grant, 1909
The number of people who use the internet is vast and this creates opportunities for fraudsters who can con or take advantage of innocent users. There are a variety of innovative and creative schemes that at first often seem very plausible to victims.
The wall of separation often appears to be a portable one – more like a Bob’s Barricade of separation, really – trundled about and erected at the convenience of some of those who use religion to their own ends, crying out against presumed incursions into the practice of their faith, and then shoved further out in an effort to impose those beliefs on everyone else through legislation limiting or prohibiting abortion, same sex marriage, and access to health care needs like contraceptives.
Kathy Bates in the movie Chéri (2009). She looks like she’s going to stab someone any minute: this is basically how I see my character.
Eleventh Hour (www.eleventhhour.co) is the leading provider of litigation support and ediscovery solutions to law firms and corporate law departments. Eleventh Hour collaborates with organization management to optimize delivery of litigation support and ediscovery services that meet legal team needs and client expectations. Eleventh Hour offers strategic and tactical solutions at the litigation support department level, as well as management of litigation cases.
So much so, I told a friend/pseudo suitor, he was in fact, “too local.”
But I did not believe it. Treachery
In the bowl of an electric mixer fitted with the paddle attachment, cream butter and Biscoff spread until smooth and creamy, 2 to 3 minutes. With mixer on low speed, add 3 cups sugar, whipping cream; mix until light and fluffy. If necessary, gradually add more powdered sugar or whipping cream to reach desired consistency.
“It is thus, by discrete action, we can secure for ourselves that which has been so well planned and so successfully accomplished.”
"Television is too potent a medium, too exacting an educational force, for anyone to dismiss even a boondock area such as The Groovy Show and its ability to shape and mold manners or morals.
I still have a lot more quince dye left and I promised myself that I will be much more patient tomorrow with the rusty iron mordant pot. Till tomorrow then.
Well if they can actually afford it good for them I guess. It is their choice.
From that point on, the reader comes to realize that the act of reading this book is in a sense a ceremony, that Silko has turned to literature to, in her own way, fight the witchery of Modern America. I have read few if any books that have the poetic force and transformative vision of Silko’s Ceremony. I have not done it justice in this short space. It must be read and then read again and again until it has been absorbed and can be recalled like the sacred stories it weaves.
Baking powder- 1 tsp
Somtimes we get caught up in the big things in life that we forget to enjoy the little things . . . last night before heading off to bed i popped into Kanes room to check out his brand new . . . wait for it . . . Record Player,remember them and vinyl LP`s?
Sure, we all sing in the shower in the privacy of our own tiled bathroom walls (and we know what that sounds like!), but have you ever wondered what it sounds like when the professionals do it?
Ahh! But you say,
Now here are a couple of things we talk about A LOT around these parts, even just last month, but their importance really can't be overstated, so humor me. Today, I received an email from the National Marrow Donor Program, marking my third year on the Be The Match registry. In 2009, I donated blood (for the first time ever) and joined the registry following a dear family friend's lymphoma diagnosis. I never could have imagined that a year later, I would be encouraging all of you to donate blood in honor of Georgia. It really is such an easy thing to do, and so, as always, we hope you'll consider becoming regular blood donors and joining the bone marrow registry. You could save a life in 2012 - how's that for a New Year's goal?!
A black wedding dress...Hum. Would you dare...I think "she" looks great.
Many women are caregivers, so it is a natural progression for an individual or group to begin to look outside itself to help others. The financial circle can also be a place where, as a group, you combine wealth to make a larger philanthropic impact to an organization that everyone has agree on. Combined funds mean a larger gift!
King Iwah - Give Me Power, Version 2
I'll be here when you are ready
29-MC Ina - tv channel remix
"After Burt's discontinued my fave carrot lotion, I've been searching for carrot lotion and coming up disappointed. Then I found Simply Rustic - yay!!! My seriously dry skin thanks you! I've used it just twice so far with super soft results. You've gained a repeat customer." Megs, Seattle
If I told you that a tortoise had a body temperature of 83 degrees, could you tell me if that animal is healthy or sick? Unless you had some idea of what normal was -- what it's temperature should be -- there's no way to know what the number means.
The corresponded came in contact with the Channel 4 news service and told that police were aggressive during the arrest, especially against the team’s local driver, who was arrested and assaulted in front of the team, and then separated from them.
Saren had a ball with my family here (more family pics tomorrow) and was a total ham all day. We had a lovely Easter just relaxing and eating all day :)
I wanted a thicker cookie so I did not flatten the dough that much. Using my Goldtouch baking pans I made 24 cookies on one sheet and made about 18 cookies with the remaining batter. That’s a lot of cookies!
I would have printed it and added it myself, but my printed decided to die on me.
Will I make any changes to how I performed during the A-Z Challenge when we reach April 2013? Maybe. I'll try to comment more--but though it wasn't the entire shebang, I'm relatively content with the 400 or so blogs I visited on the sign up list, plus visiting those who commented here and attempting to keep up with regular bloggers. I think if I'd tried visiting any more I would have completely burnt out a couple weeks after starting, and I figure moderation is better than Someone help me, I'm drowning in blogs . . . by the end of April. Not that I think so many people joining in on such an event is a bad thing; quite the opposite.
5) Bernie Madoff refers to the U.S. government as a Ponzi scheme. Laughable on one hand. But then when you consider that Madoff is the master of Ponzi schemes perhaps he knows what he's talking about.
I've done my best to regain the ten pounds I lost last week. Not really, but my body is much happier there. I expect that's where it will eventually settle.
James 1:2-4: “Count it all joy, my brothers, when you meet trials of various kinds, for you know that the testing of your faith produces steadfastness. And let steadfastness have its full effect, that you may be perfect and complete, lacking in nothing.”
Must be following my blog.
The patchwork tonnage of millenniums,
In a speech delivered by Qaradawi at the 1995 Muslim Arab Youth Association (MAYA) conference held in Toledo, Ohio, Qaradawi made the following statements:
And, this is why I went searching for night lights just recently. My Mom needs a light to navigate her way through the house during the wee hours of the night. But, searching for a nightlight that fit the bill was no easy task.
Address: 1oth St and Constitution Ave NW Washington, D.C.
I finally downloaded the new version of QuickTime so I can watch the series on my laptop (still no tv). Last night I binged on four episodes, and I’ve been waiting all day for it to be nightfall so I can watch some more.
Stamp: Tilda Magnolia
So there you have it, the third of many clocks we plan to describe in the future. Once again, this project is just a demonstration – so feel free to modify the sketch or come up with your own ideas. Thanks to Little Bird Electronics for the LilyPad items.
+1 for leaving a comment on Leigh's guestblog.
The name for the campaign comes from the idea that the United States could dramatically change the futures of thousands of people living in poverty simply by setting aside an additional one percent of their budget to provide basic sanitation and educational needs to Africans living in extreme poverty (you’re in extreme poverty when you live on less than a dollar a day). They also call for debt cancellation and strong anti-corruption measures to insure that the money Americans are already giving actually gets to those in poverty and is not taken by a corrupt, oppressive government for its own purposes.
BengoFury - tapes & transfer
We notice one thing properly. We write it down.
So what went wrong at Coventry this season was it the fact that they have an inexperienced manager in charge or was it simply that they have struggled with financial problems and relegation was inevitable this year? It is obvious that they were going to struggle especially when they haven’t got a player that has got into double figures this season, their current top scorer being Gary McSheffrey only getting nine goals. However if Lukas Jutkiewicz had stayed then they may have had a better chance to stay up but it was obvious that the club couldn’t afford to keep him for the rest of the season and in fairness did accept a good offer from Middlesbrough for the player. The 23 year old had scored nine goals in 25 games this season and this is quite an impressive record for a team that have been at the bottom of the table all season.
Of course, it would have been even more remarkable had this character actually been played by a black actress but researching this blog post it appears that Barbara Chilcott, the actress playing that role, was Canadian and white.
More striking was the response of the other side, particularly the militias. The sheer scale of the violence, its geographical range and the number of people involved made it impossible for the police and the army to seal it off from the country at large. Though the violence was focused in and around the Muslim ghettos, the lack of any boundaries between these areas and their surroundings turned virtually every urban area in Denmark into a potential battle zone.
PAUL: No. If it’s an honest rape, that individual should go immediately to the emergency room. I would give them a shot of estrogen….
We’ll talk about how to use scripture and Jesus’ as the model for your ministry. This course offers perspective on the discipleship model of Jesus and how he worked with his disciples. The gospel is transformative in the lives of people and is no less transformational for teenagers that we work with.
Yoga and fitness equipment and DVDs, Sustainable Home Decor, Organic Clothing, and workout videos available for streaming online at GaiamTV.com.
because we could not find a suitable location in Fayetteville for a satellite office, however, upon
That multitasking approach trickles down. The team I'm working for at Microsoft is responsible for three key products and a number of smaller ones. Several releases of these products are planned, developed, and supported simultaneously. As a tech writer, I am involved in all three phases for most of them: I review and contribute to specifications, I write documentation to be included with new releases, and I write materials to help existing customers.
Even in the cattle pavilions, livestock was washed clean, dried with blow driers, powdered and shaved. Some cattle were given the whole body shave including the tail and others were left with a fashionable Mohawk along the backbone.
I decided I shouldn't worry about watermarking my art too much. Story characters and creatures will always be watermarked (my art has been stolen before), but silly sketches and non-story-related creatures will not.
Ever since I stepped into the Tower Room I have been confident in my poetry and I did not have the help of undone. But know I do. I have joined undone to perform at the Festival of Words Open Mic Nights, on street corners, and other Open Mic nights and events hosted by us, the undone group.
Berkaak, Odd Are (1993) Erfaringer fra risikosonen. Opplevelse og stilutvikling i rock (Experiences from the risk zone) Oslo: Universitetsforlaget.
We moved back here to the hometown I grew up in 3yrs ago. At the time Sawyer was about 4.5 mo old. His birth buddy (cousin born pretty close to him) was about 6.5 mo old. At the time he was a giant baby something like 18lbs and she was also about 18lbs but again she had two months on him. This is what they're relationship looked like:
How much easier and freeing it is to just do what Jesus commanded: Love GOD. Love others.
I’ve chosen the blade three times before. Every time, it’s worked. Just one little cut, and I’ll concentrate on the rush I get when I feel the pain, and not on Joanna’s smug face, taunting voice and stupid red hair. It’s so tempting, but I’m getting worried that the more often I choose it, the less of a choice it becomes. Could I give up now, even if I wanted to?
Cressida also writes children’s books and has written poetry, a short film script and film reviews for a Soho magazine.
As long as the SSF is operative, menopause never happens. Menopause is directly related to SSF shutdown.
MR. JAKES: I think electric current is physical.
And although it’s meant to be female friendly, Coors are keen to stress that the 2.8% brew will also tickle the male palate. Described as having a “clear, fresh taste and a twist of citrus,” they believe that “Carling Zest is a perfect beer to enjoy with friends in the sun.”
As Winter arrives the temperatures plummet. Some also call this the Long Night Moon as the nights lengthen and the moon spends more time above the horizon.
___
Any other suggestions for oats in a jar?
"The balance of the app is going to (let you) be able to learn about Boaks and find out where Boaks Beer is available and to get us your email so we can keep you updated, have you friend us on Facebook and follow us on Twitter."
When fresh it's soft enough the just slice up and eat as is. But after it's been in the fridge and hardens up a little, it's great to slice up and pan fry. My mom would always dip it in egg (and traditionally I believe this is done) but I found that with a non-stick pan it's fine to just leave out the egg. I love it this way! It's so simple and I'm glad I got to learn how to make this special dessert with my mom and sister.
Deadline: April 20th, 2012
I Predict a Riot
And start again. If you get stuck...email me.
Commission: From day one all the way up the ranks to Diamond Director within Stella & Dot you earn 25% commission on each and every sale you make. The sale can come from an in person Trunk Show, a friend who calls you to place an individual order, or someone from out of town who you direct to your Stella Dot e-boutique. The commission is yours to keep or reinvest in your business. With Stella & Dot the home office wants to keep as much money as possible in your pocket so they pay for your Hostess Rewards they don't come out of your paycheck.
What will 2012 be like? I always wish I could see the future. Who doesn’t? We wish for a happy new year, but then it manages to deteriorate into something else. Broken resolutions. Lost tempers. Forgotten diets. Unclaimed gift cards. Such is life isn’t it? Isn’t that how it should be?
For television, he has written for Dragnet, McMillan & Wife, MASH, Mary Tyler Moore, Rhoda, Bob Newhart, Family Ties, Dr. Quinn and Diagnosis Murder.
This is an excerpt from the book by J.C. Ryle entitled Old Paths. Ryle’s books are tremendous. I was particularly impressed by the following paragraphs, not only because they describe the unconverted sinner’s heart, but because they paint a picture quite familiar to anyone who has had to deal with an abuser. For all of the “Christian” abuser’s talk of religion, his quoting of Bible verses, and his performance in a church, yet his heart remains stone and evidences these rock-hard qualities:
He did not. And if a thing is worth saying, it is worth saying twice. He did not.
After the last couple of reviews have been about Pale Ales and an IPA thought is was time for a good PROPER stout review! This dark beauty comes from Coopers in South Australia and has been my favorite stout for many years mainly due to its great availability throughout Australia and abroad. It also sparked my interest in seeking out heavier beer styles with floatie bits and as a result more unique craft beers.
Toy’s “It is still beautiful” song that he sings during the documentary,
It seems to me a strange thing, mystifying, that the Democratic Party’s incumbent president, who has extended & expanded every odious bush administration policy, has betrayed every liberal principle, has broken every campaign promise, is in brazen contempt of the Constitution and several Federal laws, and has now unilaterally offered to cut Social Security, will be running unopposed in the 2012 primary.
compromise the amount of life insurance needed or the duration of
When I first started working downtown, almost nine years ago, it was a whole new world for me: Elevators! Skyways! Shopping and restaurants and dry cleaners and banks! You can walk for literal miles in Minneapolis without going outside, a lovely thing indeed considering that Mother Nature, at this latitude, wants to kill you. I was taken around, shown the “regular” beggars, where to go for late-afternoon treats, advised to stay to the right on the escalators and to not waste people’s time with taking elevators only one floor.
In fact, the only point of criticism I wish to make is that the novels are starting to feel a little formulaic. Not in terms of a central conflict being solved in the overall arc of the series, but more because each book has featured a main storyline, and then a subplot where some of the key protagonists end up going off on their own adventure. It allows Butcher to skip between them and create cliff-hanger endings to chapters, but it feels very artificial in this third novel. I look forward to seeing if he changes this formula in the fourth, since it is getting tired in my opinion.
At that point, I realized the little project had grown into a standalone novel. Leaner and better-written than the epic, it stood more of a chance of meeting agents’ and publishers’ submission guidelines as well.
His arms will be there when ours are not. Teach them to walk toward his arms.
Somehow it wound up in my stash, only to be found a few weeks ago. It didn't inspire me. I no longer liked it. But current pre-schooler loved it and wanted bags from it for her teachers...
Things are far from perfect in my little world-
Money, and specifically Thror's treasure, drives much of the plot of The Hobbit. When Thorin is captured by the forest elves, he refuses to state his business in the Mirkwood, fearing--with, we're led to believe, some justification--that their king will only release him in exchange for a share of the treasure. When Bilbo and the dwarfs escape the elves and arrive in Lake Town, the people are overjoyed at the return of the king under the mountain, but the master of the town fears for his business ties with the forest king. Smaug is killed, with relatively little fuss and almost no input from our heroes, several chapters before the novel comes to an end, and what takes up these remaining chapters is a dispute over how to distribute his hoard: the people of Lake Town and the elves initially believe that Thorin is dead and march on the mountain to claim the treasure for themselves; when they discover that he is alive, they demand compensation for the destruction of Lake Town; Thorin refuses, and a tense and volatile siege follows. The further I read in The Hobbit, the clearer it became that the disconnect between it and The Lord of the Rings wasn't one of tone or complexity, but of subgenre. Tolkien, who is credited with inventing, or at least codifying, epic fantasy, wasn't practicing it here. Instead, The Hobbit reads like a very strange cross between sword & sorcery, whose characters are mercenaries rather than heroes, trying to make a buck rather than save the world, and the modern reaction to Tolkien's own conception of epic fantasy, which replaces honor, chivalry, and noble kings with messy political systems whose rulers are more concerned with accruing power and wealth than in triumphing over evil.
Before making the sugar recipe below, wash off the vanilla bean pod, lay it out to dry completely, and then place it in a bowl of sugar for about a week or two. This will help the sugar to become infused with a vanilla flavor.
Too hot above the thermocline
Horatio at the Bridge (either the first two verses, or the last two verses, or both): Emily, Jillian, Sarah R
The Act currently provides that an LEP is made by the Minister. The Act sets out the procedure whereby:
What makes ‘Lady Chatterley’s Lover’ brilliant is that Lawrence manages to pick out an undercurrent, a social feeling, and speak about it plainly. For example he nails the aversion females have to giving themselves completely to sex and the hatred men have when women constantly hold back. It has something for men and women alike, as it tells both their frustrations with equal sympathy and spite. There are a lot of messages, a lot of elements in this book. I personally related to the misguided idea of people stepping away from their humanity for something spiritually higher – but what exactly and for what point? But I think that even if people don’t get them all the ideas, they will understand the need for real, honest, free relationships – to cut back the pressure and bullshit that society forces.
Any photo taken at less than f8 will be a bit soft, but can be sharpened, if needed.
3. The Lighting. Remember the last time you were in a nightclub or bar and went to the bathroom? You tip toe around, trying hard not to touch anything lest you have to go boil a finger or two afterwards, go to the wash basin, look up, and then scream at the scary-as-hell face staring back at you. Every time. Now, while those bathrooms are designed specifically to cause minor heart attacks, normal clean bathrooms have a similar thing going on. Since bathrooms are usually white and full of reflective surfaces, overhead bathroom lights have the tendency to be overly bright and not the most flattering. Remember The First Wives Club? Remember that hilarious scene when Brett Artounian describes the role he wants middle-aged Elise Elliot to play, when she thinks she’s being cast for the role of the young and stylish Monique? If not, I give you his stellar (if over-dramatic) description of who he’s casting her as, and what the theatre uses overhead lighting for:
A Wayward Thought
What object would you prefer not to live without?
So, off went the sole survivor of the mouse family, into the bushes near my home.
Lord’s Resistance Army objectives. I have them here. “To remove dictatorship and stop the oppression of our people.” Now, again Lord’s Resistance Army is who Obama sent troops to help nations wipe out. The objectives of the Lord’s Resistance Army, what they’re trying to accomplish with their military action in these countries is the following: “To remove dictatorship and stop the oppression of our people; to fight for the immediate restoration of the competitive multiparty democracy in Uganda; to see an end to gross violation of human rights and dignity of Ugandans; to ensure the restoration of peace and security in Uganda, to ensure unity, sovereignty, and economic prosperity beneficial to all Ugandans, and to bring to an end the repressive policy of deliberate marginalization of groups of people who may not agree with the LRA ideology.” Those are the objectives of the group that we are fighting, or who are being fought and we are joining in the effort to remove them from the battlefield.
It took us three attempts over the last few years to come and visit this city. It was worth the effort. Anywhere you go, magnificently designed buildings are in your view. Entry into the public buildings provides fantastically designed interiors with the figurines, wall murals, columns, staircases, and materials used to finish the floors, walls, and ceilings.
Mary Alice talks to us tonight about power and as the episode title suggests, losing that power. All the women (and a man) of Wisteria Lane have to come to grips with losing control over parts of their lives.
4 march - Kaserne - Basel, Switzerland
However, the reverse is true as well. If God is against us, it doesn’t matter who is for us!
Is this a viable commercial product? Let’s put it this way, says entrepreneur and angel investor Danny Briere. “It’s very rare, when you’re evaluating businesses, that you can envision a company or product being around 100 years from now.” Hiccupops is one them. “It solves a very simple, basic need.” It also “has some terrific potential benefits for society,” adds Christopher Levesque, who’s advising the team of University of Connecticut MBA students who will help Kievman launch her product this summer. “It straddles that line between an attractive, go-to product that people might like to savor and a helpful nutraceutical aid.” Hiccups is a common side effect of chemotherapy.
Every parent talks about how quickly the time flies. It really does! Especially with the first child. I urged him to roll over, sit, and then walk. Cheering and clapping all the way from milestone to milestone. A short time later he was at T-ball practice and learning to ride a bike.
Belles zeroes on the lives of two completely different girls who are inexplicably linked: Isabelle (Izzie), the spunky swimmer who comes from the "wrong side of town," and Mirabelle (Mira), the privileged social butterfly who's still finding out who she is. Set in a beachy Southern town, it may not be a fantasy book but it's still kind of magical in its own way.
Most biographers now point to 8 Amity St. (which has since been renumbered 197), also in Cobble Hill, as Jennie Jerome’s birthplace, because that’s where the Jerome family was living in 1854, according to an 1854-55 City Directory. This assertion, then, depends on the truthfulness of the birth date most often attributed to her, January 9, 1854.
chilli padi (just 1 really hot chilli, seeded)
His lotus-like feet delight his lovers.
Light supper provided; cash bar
As a political science major, especially one with an African Studies minor, the idea of visiting and volunteering at Townships was especially appealing. After Operation Hunger, I didnt feel like I had seen enough as it focused mainly on children. Waking up so early was not particularly appealing, but again, I want to see it all!
The uprising killed 55 people, destroyed 1,573 businesses and cost $1 billion in the initial three days, eclipsing the damage done in the Watts Riot of 1965. Like Watts, the hardest hit area was South Central, home to much of the city’s African American population. I suppose the only positive to come out of this was that in 1992, 60% of the LAPD was white – now it is 60% minority.
It was Mother’s Day after all and I guess that’s where the people were.
And later that day, we went to see the 270 year-old Tybee Island Lighthouse.
Whew! What a blast!
The good news was that I’m changing the site and my plan was to actually have the appearance changed by Wednesday and to redo the intro and everything else for that matter. However, with falling sick, I completely forgot to update my blog and all of you with the details.
While the Joker steals the show, everyone else is in fine form. Christian Bale shows he was no fluke in Batman Begins. No small feat there. Michael Keaton limped through his second turn as the Caped Crusader. He was the last guy brave enough to try twice. Newcomers Aaron Eckhart and Maggie Gyllenhaal are fine additions to the cast, as long as they both lasted.
Sadly, however, Von Rectangle never lived to see his theories come close to fruition. The typical post war car park was little more than a small piece of undeveloped waste ground, or un-reclaimed bombsite. A place where an ancient withered old man, in a flat cap with a ¾” rollup seemingly glued to his lower lip, sat in a little shed at the entrance hading out tickets before gesturing vaguely towards the back of the area while muttering something about ‘plenty of spaces up the back, me ol’ cock’ in a vaguely sexually-predator-esque manner. This was far from the modern utopia than Von Rectangle envisaged, leaving him distraught and suicidal.
What’s a relapse? For me, it usually means a solid 2 weeks of barely being able to walk (if at all), not being able to hold a cup or a pen or be able to type, and possible lack of bladder control. When I relapse, someone else has to wash my hair and style it, bathe and shave me. Because I can’t even stand up in the shower to do these things myself, and I can’t hold myself up in the bathtub. I certainly can’t work. It’s pretty lame, although it gives me a chance to catch up on my favorite TV series (I’ve seen all of the CSIs this way, and a lot of Law and Order: SVU).
And as filler:
* Warehouse Manager
Living in Florida should not allow me to speak on the lack of qualification that our leaders have, we beach bums have had our grievances with those who allegedly represent us but I don't want to "Recount" that today. Get it recount.....hahahahaha not really funny it was a long 8 years.
“But if the NFL was really what I wanted to do, I would have just played out (the 2012) season and tried to see what would happen.”
We have wider streets but more narrow points of view.
What films have influenced you as a director? Any favourites?
quite capable of making themselves.
So it was on Thursday when I was working feverishly to whittle down the to-do list, and managing to get everything but the outdoor stuff that I should have done first, that I came to installing the new front door lock.
When I got my iPad, I had a moment of anxiety as the price of the thing hit me. In full disclosure, I bought the 32G wi-fi only iPad. It's the middle of the road... I could have paid $100 less for the 16G, but I've been burned with Apple products in the past with insufficient memory/hard drive space. The cheapest versions of Apple products tend not to weather the years all that well, in my experience. So, I paid extra for the next level up and I'm pretty confident it will last me as long as I need it to (note: I do typically rotate my gadgets on 2 year basis, if I can afford it. Right now, I can't. I need to be reasonably certain that my gadgets will last beyond 2 years, because I want to be able to upgrade them on my own terms, not on Apple's. Also note: I have been an Apple user for over 20 years. I speak from experience on this).
The shocking revelation that a seven year old boy from Hull was branded a 'racist' by his school for asking a fellow pupil a question demonstrates the politically correct depths to which the Lib-Lab-Con parties have plunged our country.
Posting Kosovel’s ‘Poem No. 1′, with its purchase of ‘four Zeta’ allows me to jump to Frank O’Hara also visiting the tobacconist, in this this poem which I just love. (The ‘Lady’ of the title is Billy Holiday.)
It’s nice to see the time we’ve spent getting to know these characters over the last few years has been worth it. Joss Whedon has definitely proved that with a great director, casts and story, nothing will go wrong.
It’s hard to describe, but when you eventually get control over someone who has no natural control and is so big, well, it makes you feel big. It is a real display of machismo. . . . You could show you were a real man if you could beat down a big powerful animal. And I could always tell who had had a fight with their wife the morning or night before. We have not changed much since cave days. Men are still beating up women, still trying to run the world with domination. And if you notice, all the elephants we work with are females.
This shows me that the writer could be weak in a number of areas.
Sir Alistair Graham, who was chairman of the Committee on Standards in Public Life which drew up the rules on party political funding, said Lord Feldman’s decision to hold meetings at No 10 is ‘entirely improper’.
Right now we are so focused on Christmas and its red/white decoration.
A related issue arises for exceptions that allow ‘research or study’. In some countries, such as the UK, the exception is limited to ‘private’ research or study, and use of copyright content for research in corporate entities is licensed, recompensing the creators and publishers of the content. In Australia, on the other hand, there is no such qualification and some corporations seek to rely on the exception to avoid licensing arrangements.
Processor Brand AMD
Apparently, the changes are motivated by a desire for "a more sustainable funding model than it has had in the past to avoid disruptions in agency operations due to economic fluctuations". But PTO stability has a price-tag for applicants and hence the innovative sector of the broader economy - won't higher prices contribute to the very economic fluctuations they are seeking to mitigate for themselves?
3. Write eleven new questions.
What KhatPat aims to do is show that these evils are prevalent in society. And hope that parents will take the steps necessary to fix it!
I'm a 20 something Chicago gal who loves to smile :D I'm a student at DePaul University, expecting to graduate this summer with a BA in Journalism and Public Relations/ Advertising. I'm a fashion event writer for Examiner.com. My dreams for the future are to write for a magazine or book publishing company, write a best-selling novel, and have a home somewhere close to the beach. But for now...I'm taking each day as it comes and sharing it all with you! From fashion and food, to music and love, I hope you will enjoy my journal on life. Thanks for stopping by! xoxo
World of Plants
Since its just a dimension
Yellow sunshine butter
When linking your entries, please make sure it is linked to the specific post your layout is in, not your blog as a whole as it can be hard later in the month to find your layout, especially if you blog often. You can also link from any gallery including Facebook and Flickr.
According to Barth, a Christian account of dogmatics and ethics – both evangelical and catholic – begins with a particular person – Jesus Christ – and in his contemporaneous power, truth and love graciously made available to us by the ministry of the Spirit. This too is Chris Holmes’ claim in his delightful and eloquently written essay, Ethics in the Presence of Christ. Slaying the dragon of christological exemplarism (‘Exemplarism in Christian Ethics trades upon principles and a dead Jesus, a Jesus who lives only inasmuch as his example guides. Exemplarism is imprisoned by immanence, the idea that the resources we need for good conduct, for living humanly, are present within the matrix of our own experience, so that Jesus himself is called upon only inasmuch as he corroborates values and attitudes commensurate with our account of what it means to be “ethical”’) as a foundation for Christian and ecclesial existence, Holmes seeks to ‘draw the life of the Christian community into the orbit of the presence and ongoing ministry of Christ, its natural environment, and thus to explore the consequences of his presence for ethics and offer an account of the moral landscape of ethics that is dependent on its environment’.
If you have tickets to a great show or if you come to Asheville for any other event or reason, stay at Lovers’ Loop Retreat, our affordable Asheville vacation rental. Contact us at 828-545-2950 or loversloop(at)gmail(dot)com.
consciously controlling it, or not, I do think it's what's
It would only be most appropriate to sit here and sip on a hot cup of coffee (with cream and sugar, as opposed to black) as I jingle Heaven’s portals with a Christmas greeting to you. The sights and sounds of the holidays have a way of tugging at the memories of my heart, and I always miss you so much during the holidays.
Kinda cool, with a suspect (photo for inspiration), clues, evidence, testimony...ie... things to include on your layout, colour scheme, journalling prompts. So far I like...!!!!
A squirrel with a penchant for running around in circles had to be removed from the pitch in a cardboard box after gatecrashing a Women's Professional Soccer championship match at the weekend.
Penguin: "Are all the sodas now diet sodas?"
MacBain made that recording in her car on the way to Lake Jackson United Methodist Church several weeks before the American Atheists’ conference.
to create some texture.
Maybe one day mom will relent. she says if that ever happens it will be Texas Sundogs II. a fresh start. I miss all my friends out there in the ethers. I miss those who have crossed the bridge, but know I will see them all again. I have loved my adventures with Asta and Stanny baby as well as the girl who tried to teach me to flirt...Lacy. Thanks to all of y'all who gave us so much support when grama was sick...it helped us. Gussie..very special friend. so many friends...too many to mention.
P.S. Where the hell has the month of June gone? This is the third year in a row that we've had a strange spring to be followed by a June that is much more like August. 94-96 degrees??? The forcast for the next 6 days? Above 90 every day. Ugh. While I realize one cannot just look at a day or a month and say, "Ha! Climate change is real and it is upon us!", we've had one record hot year after another. Record numbers of wild fires, record drought, record tornadoes, record hurricanes. Yeah, welcome to human caused climate change.
146. Tintin in America: Herge
Ever since studying the technology adoption lifecycle years ago in my Intro to Mass Comm class, I’ve envied the innovators and even the early adopters. These are the ones who joined Facebook before it was a thing, the ones who know how to use new operating systems before they’re even officially released. They could easily list PhotoShop as their second language.
Teachers said that there was barely enough time in the gym for the middle and high schoolers to get their mandated PE in before they graduated. DOE plans to give Success Academy one third of the gym time the first year, when they will only have a kindergarten and first grade in the building. "That is only year one. How will our students get time in the gym as they expand?” asked Jeff Trip, a teacher at International Studies.
Han has a bizarre idea of taking Ollie outside to experience the snow. Given that he won't like it, it is nearly -5 outside and he won't like being wrapped up to within an inch of his life, I don't see the point. Of course, I will have no say in the matter so momentarily we will be stepping out into the cold.
GOLD
10. Write every day. Whether it’s in my personal journal, my blog, a marketing campaign for an online store, I need to write every day. It soothes my soul, decreases my depression, keeps my mind active, and makes me feel like I’m part of a community.
The Tide – Plantman (chosen by Tomothy)
It wasn't until Mo met Shawn that she learned about Corky's Curse, more fondly known as “the-you-know-what.” Now, the big concern for Mo wasn't the bumps in the night but what could happen or will happen at Wren's House. The newest local restaurant her father has worked so hard to put together for her and her sister.
Kegged on 3-19 and the F.G. is a bit higher than normal. I am wondering if the ABV is actually higher and the extra specific gravity comes from chocolate in the beer. Tastes rather nice whatever the case.
Two of the presenter’s favorite apps mentioned in this session were: iWriteWords, and anything produced by Duck Duck Moose. I tried the iWriteWords app, because there was a free version and I had my iphone with me. It was pretty fun, and I think that the kids would enjoy it! Catie suggested that in order to train the children to use the devices and apps, you begin in small groups that are supervised, and then release them to work independently. She said that there are usually settings in most iPods and computers that you will want to set, such as “No purchasing apps with your stored credit card,” etc. You can turn off internet browsing, the camera, and any other things that you do not want your students to get into. In order to turn them back on, the child would need your password. If you would like to download Catie’s handout, click here.
This was the first True Romance palette I wanted to try, and I’m happy to say that the experience prompted me to go take another look at the other palettes out there =P
Sadly, today marks the final week that we will have the pleasure of being inspired by two of our Shabby Girls ... Audrey Pettit and Melissa Hubert. We have thoroughly enjoyed seeing their beautiful work week after week, and I think I can speak for everyone on the team and all of our followers when I say that they will be missed terribly here in the Tea Room. I thank both Audrey and Melissa for joining me in this journey ... they didn't know what they were signing up for way back in March when I searched them out and invited them to join the team! My gratitude for all the time and efforts they put into inspiring us with wonderful designs and touching all of your lives with sweet comments on your projects is simply immeasurable! Best wishes girlies ... please come back and visit us as often as you can!!
Storms
A few weeks ago, on our way home in the car, after a pleasant meal and afternoon we spent together with Willem; it suddenly emerged that the story of the boy in the attic was true… except… the book had survived!
it’s all about the fashion
I honestly don’t know. They both produce milk. They both can be moo-thers (did you see what I did there? No, I don’t either). They both are livestock.
Lord we ask you to intercede on our behalf, to care and nurture those who need it and give strength to all who can enact change.
He has been known for his direct talk with the media and his witty answers made him a favourite among the press (not always). Hence, the situation in the dressing room also should have been no different as he never likes to mince his words. He was respected for his tactics during the game, while sometimes he was slammed for the same. But, at the end of the day, his tactics turned out to be a better one, with the trophy in Real Madrid’s hand. Now, what do the critics have to say about his tactics?
People will not follow your blog tour if you keep recycling the same article. Make sure you send your guest post, a bio, a photo of you, a photo of your cover days in advance. Then on the day the article is posted, you need to visit the blog several times and respond to comments.
The other will be graduating from high school/college with her AA.
All the world’s a stage,
Those who live there look to her guidance,
How I am similar to a maine coon cat (or other animal).
The article also quotes an unidentified EP spokesman as saying "The directive itself says software is not patentable and the European Patent Office says the same, but software patents have been allowed anyway. The European Patent Office has problems in taking a decision on whether to allow a patent or not."
I hope Unite’s calls for action are heard and implemented. There is more to workers’ rights than unveiling a plaque, fine words and a public holiday. Hopefully this government will be able to strengthen health and safety for those who work in Gibraltar.
One year and ten months later, the couches are starting to show some wear and tear that should not be happening. Since I had bought the store's 5 year warranty again, I called them up. They sent a different man this time. And although he put on a braver front, he made it very clear to me that the dog had to go when he came back to repair my couches. Pookie did not like that, so he curled his lip, showed his fangs and went all beast in my arms. We never heard from that man again either. That was about three weeks ago. So I called the furniture store, and after a few days they called me back to tell me we are getting a full store credit for the purchase price and tax, and we have 30 days to go to any of their stores and pick out a new set. But this time, we get to keep the old couches, because they don't want them back.
I opted to leave the center of my night stand unglazed, because I wanted it to look more like an actual mirror, and wanted to get it as shiny as I could.
I no longer have to worry about what will happen if I’m not home by 2pm to be able to sleep during the afternoon.
Freedom to eat when hungry, sleep when tired, use the bathroom as needed without permission.
offers attendant beauty lines for both teens and adults (called Volturi and Luna, respectively). The producers even partnered with PRO Beauty Tools to create a branded line of hair tools to help fans easily mimic Twilight‘s characters’ hairstyles.
Me: Really? Is that all?
Chasing physical enchantment
Fridge Coasters are beautifully designed, super absorbent "liners" that fit inside every refrigerator no matter the manufacturer or refrigerator model you own. All coasters are designed with perforation lines to ensure a snug fit.
Happy birthday to Yesternight's Voyage, a blog everyone should follow. The wonderful Joyce (a.k.a. Clipper) runs a tight ship over there, and she's now been holding down the fort for a year! Yay!
The story revolves around a teenage girl’s promises to save Zed from the human hordes.
Christmas Cookies ,
Page numbers are from the 2010 Skyhorse Publishing edition.
The tiny kitten was happily munching on something when the stray pooch dropped by. Its furs got bristled as it bounced a few steps backward.
Holy Moly.. 3 blogs in 3 days.. what is going on?? I'm hoping I keep up this blogging momentum!!
I'll dig with it.
With a house that is!!!!
so i find myself sort of at the nexus of everything i ever thought i wanted. and it's amazing and hard to believe. my wonderful husband, my beautiful, bright children. my freelance strong. my heart stronger. a man i can depend on.
You know when you've been having that kind of week? The kind that calls for more caffeine, more sleep and perhaps a bit of understanding? Yeah, it's been one of those weeks. Well, have I got a remedy that works wonders.
Father, cause me to be fruitful in every good work and to increase in Your knowledge in Jesus Christ Name! Amen!
He said this was necessary despite success stories like Petronas, AirAsia, Maxis, Celcom, DiGi and others. “Roy Disney once remarked that creativity is a funny thing — difficult to quantify, but obvious when it’s missing.
2. Determined (Vows Of Vengeance) 04:48
To quote the great Mr Fawlty again “Otherwise OK?” Short of having two dead pigeons in the water tank, how could it be worse!
I have two final handmade gifts to share.
Earlier this week I had one of the rare occasions when I have to smarten up and bought some bobbles to tie my hair back. So, yesterday I decided that I’d tie my hair back to stop it getting in my eyes and mouth, which is a pain in the arse. Anyway, could the ponytail be the key to my running powers?
It also appears that the port would like some passenger trains on the branch replaced by buses. As the port had agreed to double-track the branch to increase the capacity, this is a bit of a cheek.
In Christ (to Be Continued God willing watch the video LIFE CHANGING)
Lloyd Bridges (Blown Away)
Augustine writes: “He has accomplished what he taught us: He has shown us what He commanded us to do. He laid down his own life for his sheep, that within our mystery he might change his body and blood into food, and nourish the sheep he had redeemed with the food of his own flesh. He has shown us the way we must follow, despite fear of death. He has laid down the pattern to which we must conform ourselves. The first duty laid on us is to use our worldly goods in mercy for the needs of his sheep, and then, if necessary, give even our lives for them. He that will not give of his substance for his sheep, how shall he lay down his life for them?” (Tr. 46 in John, 5th century). Do you look to Jesus the Good Shepherd, to receive the strength and courage you need to live and serve as his disciple?
External control are you gonna let them get you?
Step 9: Place into hot oil, turn once such that each side is golden. BreAnna and Clare busied themselves with frying the dough as I was briefly occupied with an email. They began to smell delicious!
The boys will also read a variety of books from the library.
From this it is easy to see that God would have men set themselves in the way of his wrath and keep it off, and that He is greatly angered if this is not done. That is what I meant when I spoke above about taking the rod out of God’s hands. Let him fast who will. Let him go down on his knees and bow and fall to the ground, if he is in earnest; for the bowing and kneeling that has been practiced hitherto in the chapters and monasteries was not in earnest; it was, and still is, mere apery. It is not for nothing that I exhort pastors and preachers to impress this upon the people, for I see plainly that it rests entirely with the preachers whether the people shall amend their ways and pray, or not. Little will be accomplished by preaching in which men call Luther names and blaspheme, and let repentance and prayer alone; but where God’s Word is spoken, it is not without fruit. They, however, must preach as though they were preaching to saints who had learned all that there was to know about repentance and faith, and therefore had to talk about something higher.
To reiterate, unless it’s the show’s intention (and it really isn’t in this case), there’s literally no justification to confuse your viewers within the first 40 seconds of the show. There’s also a reason I call my reviews “script reviews” and not “editing reviews.”
Slide empty pan onto cold hob.
The abundance of celebrity cookbooks (Alicia Silverstone, Suzanne Sommers, Eva Longoria, Trisha Yearwood) makes it easy to dismiss Paltrow’s book as just another marketing agent of her media empire, which includes movies, television and the website/blog www.goop.com. Indeed, whenever I pick up a cookbook with a modelesque woman on the cover, I immediate assume one of two things: (1) the recipes are “diet” recipes and therefore insipid and uninspired or (2) the cookbook has been ghost-written and has little to do with the person on the cover. My assumption was dead wrong for My Father’s Daughter. The recipes are tested, tasty and truthful. In fact, almost every recipe opens with an anecdotal sentence about Paltrow’s memories of the dish, how she involves her children in its preparation or simply why she loves it so much. Paltrow’s children are central to this book (she claims that she is her children’s mother every bit as much as she is her father’s daughter) and there are lots of practical tips on how to get children involved in making meals. The recipes not only bring people together for eating, but also for cooking. Children, inexperienced chefs and even just taste testers, can join the culinary action.
“When I bored of you.”
The new amendment was jointly introduced by Councilmember Jim Graham, Chairman of the Human Services Committee, and Councilmember Michael Brown, Chairman of the Housing and Workforce Development.
As my mother's music coiled around my 10-year-old eardrums, I laid in the crosshairs of an early morning sun and a late summer breeze, flat on my back with covers pulled just above my chest. I blinked lazily to coax myself awake, when something weird caught my attention: two hair-thin antennae fanning the air near my chin.
drowning me out until I surrender in your arms
The formula was good, an equal balance of an ongoing story and a story within the episode, with the mini titles for each chapter. Again, "reading" like a comic. Then we have the homages, where everyone on the internet cried "rip off!" and missed the point: the difference between an homage and a rip off is love.
Don’t dream of a peaceful solution,
M/F/S – 2/4/3
And Last, but not least...another great idea by a fellow blogger...Homeworkopoly. This is my first time using this and I am still reading up on how to make it operate, but I am getting into the swing of things and at least getting my document ready to print so I can laminate. My inspiration came from Ladybug's Teacher Files. Please see her original document. She was sooooo sweet and even told me what fonts she used. They are now my favorite fonts to use!!! LOVE them! If you haven't used smiley monster and Elephants in Cherry Trees together, they are a MUST! I pretty much kept everything the same, just tweaked a few things!
And this is milady's favourite dress that she's been told to wear;
I really want to warp Inara next, but I’ll have to see if I have enough yarn in the proper size to do that!! Let me rephrase that: I have to see if there’s enough yarn in the proper size in colors I actually want to use! I still have tons of the duller colors, but I’d rather mix them with something bright. Maybe I’ll use Ampstrike’s card weaving cards next…
As for my card,it was a card i made back in June,pretty easy peasy!
Hi everyone and a very happy Monday morning to you. Lynsey here with this week's challenge and my theme for you this week is to 'A card a matching tag'.
You will find recipes for every part of the day — from new ideas for breakfast to share with the kids in the weekend to my favourite easy lunch and dinner recipes and, of course, my forever favourite puddings, which I can never get enough of ! There are soups to share, loaves to inspire you to ‘cut and come again’, special recipes your children can prepare and simple yet elegant suppers to serve to friends
THE TYGER
the comforts of home. the familiarity of old friends.
Yup, my husband gave me an iPhone for Mother's Day, and so lately I spend SO much less time on my laptop or desktop, and LOTS more time playing around on this little baby!
So let’s start at the beginning: first and foremost, sales are THE most important thing to a company. Everything else stems from that. Without sales, there really wouldn’t be anything else to analyze. And Sales Growth numbers show you how that company is growing.
Just so you know I'm not dead.
May 23, Charleston, WV Taught by Sally Lynn
- Patricia's Restaurant (35 Broadway): Grade Pending, 42 violation points
rushonrock: Do you have separate personal goals in the sound you wish to achieve with each project?
In the aftermath, doctors induced a coma, and had to remove part of her brain the size of an egg (and for a 4 year old, that's fairly substantial).
What exactly is belly fat, anyway?
This is shocking news so I’ll take a second for everyone to compose themselves.
Time for pouch number 3
The study suggests that as we age we become more suited to social and compassionate activities. Changes in our nervous systems which bring about these emotional intelligence changes are likely not only to give older people social advantages but to give them (us) an edge in the workplace in those tasks involving social relationships and caring for others.
Hold on. Doesn't the United States have the best universities in the world? Isn't the issue a little more complicated? Hasn't productivity been doing pretty well? Maybe the issue, as economist Dean Baker points out, is the distribution of the gains from productivity growth.
They’re wearing the latest clothes in a nautical way
When she says she still touring because “I like to sing, it’s who I am. I’ll do it until I don’t enjoy it or people don’t show up,” it sounds like an easy answer. It’s only later, when Olivia steps onto stage that we realize it’s the exact truth – and that at 63, she still has what it takes. She loves performing, she loves her crowd, and they can’t seem to help but love her back – it’s clear this Sri Lankan audience adores her. They’re clapping even before she steps on stage, and when she does walk on dressed all in glittering black, the applause swells. (The De Lanerolle brothers having already done a stellar job of warming us up for her with renditions of ‘Spanish Eyes’ and ‘Show Me The Way to Amarillo’.)
30But God gave him back from the dead:
Hills Free Nights Neh!!!!!!!
Edited to add: Happy Cinco de Mayo!
was high time i left it,it was getting bored and I felt nothing was a challenge anymore. The present place is the opposite..so
Because I am fortunate enough to have an incredible support system, many with medical backgrounds, I was kicked out of the hospital early because they had a few reported cases of staph and MSR floating around. (Thank you again dear surgeon!)
08-George Boswell-Jah Fire
Already it is November and our first snow fall of the season is happening as we share. I am not particularly fond of driving in the snow, however I do enjoy the pristine beauty of newly fallen snow. The fresh smell, the stark whiteness intermingled with evergreens and the smell of chimney smoke in the background. These are more memories of childhood than like I experienced in the city, and so now when they happen it is like bringing out an old friend to play, or perhaps bringing out my inner child. I always loved snow as a child and spent many hours ‘stranded up in the north’ digging out forts in the snowbanks, sliding down the ravine, and skating like I was trying out for the Olympics were wonderful ways to pass the time. I think I am guided to share these memories as it is important to remember the wonderful times and bring that energy in the now and it is also very important to find time to go out and play as you did as child. It helps to cleanse our energy fields, release and rejuvenate. Make some plans to enjoy and play over the next month, just as you did as a child.
Gourmet Coffee Express, $24 for 12
I think it's pretty fair to say that not many people like bad news. In fact, the only people I can think that would like bad news are those who will benefit from others misfortune.
With all of my methods exhausted, I decided to let it go and move to plan B: Painting.
Pear- Pear trees and their fruit are less susceptible to insects and disease than many other fruit trees.
So thankful today for the blessing of encouragement and
El Grande Vikingo (the husband, a.k.a. the Viking, is going back to the original name, since it's very likely that we're going back to Mexico, but I'm not saying anything yet, because he still hasn't definitely put pen to paper and although I'm already thinking about selling the cars and having the insides of the house put into a container, I haven't actually even ironed anything in a while, let alone folded and packed) says I can be all warm and fuzzy as long as someone remembers to pick up coffee regularly at the store, and, well, it's been ages since my last 'ohmizeus-and-other-as-valid-deities-I've-run-out-of-the-sweet-manna-that-keeps-my-soul-going-someone-fucking-do-something-quick' (this might also apply if one were to imagine 'sweet manna' to refer to wine), which leads me to believe that I've been downright pleasant lately.
I gave her a very angry stare and walk away. She keeps looking at me after i walk away.
Over the years, all sorts of music artist have fallen foul of the law (yup, Bowie, Kid Rock, Johnny Cash, Jim Morrison, Sinatra, Jack White, Elvis, Michael Jackson, Sid Vicious, Axl Rose, Jimi Hendrix, David Crosby and many more have all found themselves pissing in a bucket for a night or two), anything from drunk and disorderly (which only seems to increase their popularity in the eyes of the fan), brawling and punching photographers, right down to under age sex. Some of them rise to much bigger stars after the event, whereas other (Johnathan King anyone??) can never return. But there is no guide for us poor fans, on how we should react to these misdemeanors. Let me elaborate...
Marketing alcoholic beverages to women usually contains elements of fun, glamor and even sophistication.
This recipe needed a little tweaking for my taste, mostly with the sugar in the cookie dough (changed from regular sugar to powdered sugar to not have a grainy texture in the dough, and the cooking time for the brownies. Also, thank heavens the cookie dough doesn't require any eggs (not that I ever say no to raw cookie dough with eggs... heh).
I must add that I believe too that sometimes organizations which
This riddle keeps coming up in “Alice in Wonderland”....but just what is the meaning of it?
But what of the results? Does the international success tell us that the locals have dropped their game, or that we are resting on our laurels? Hardly. When you consider the volume of beer presented and the high standard of craft brewing around the world right now, Australia’s modest population should be very proud of our place on the world stage. Couple this with the fact that more and more international brewing heavy-weights are sending beers to our awards and you can see that the overall quality is extremely impressive. Again, for the nerds, I’ll list some facts and figures and results. For now, it’s just about the occasion.
And nothing pleaseth but rare accidents.
Card Stock: Stampin Up Daffodil Delight and Whisper White;
2 The Lost Child
These are three sentences from the opening chapter of Stephen King's latest novel, 11/22/63. I don't remember the last time I read a book that so completely enthralled me from the very first sentence. I continued to be enthralled for all 842 pages (plus the 7-page afterword).
Sorry for the lack of posts lately, I'm in Canada visiting family and friends right now. I'm actually doing loads of baking while on vacation (you know you love to bake when...) so expect some fun delicious posts in the upcoming weeks! :)
I feel like a failure. In my own mind I'm failing at something. I'm not sure what anyone else thinks, because the only ones witnessing this are the kids and my husband. My husband is not a neat freak, so it's not going to bother him. Miss K follows in her dad's footsteps so she is not fazed by it. And Little E, he's not really old enough to realize how OCD I am.
In the little yellow house, in the corner of the kitchen, in my peter pan blouse, my middle-school self unfolds a letter. Stage dad stands to the side, pretending to be downcast, holding back a proud smile.
My point is that, yes, we should maximize our health potential by adopting those things that we know will help us pursue our other goals in life, but health should not be the "new religion" that promises good health and long lives to one and all. The second point is that we need to put as much effort into our psychological/spiritual life as we do into our physical life in order that we get a more balanced perspective on life, and this means incorporating meditation/prayer into our daily rituals too. This is not something new for we humans but something that mankind has been naturally doing since they first stopped dragging their knuckles along the ground! It's just that it doesn't get mentioned much in the health and well-being literature these days!
The Senior Showcase is going to make or break each of the four, in a funny, touching, spectacular finale that only Elizabeth Eulberg could perform.
The quote of “Art imitates Life” is so true. How often have we seen expression of self through some crazy concepts or even more crazier lyrics? I.e. “‘Til the sweat drips from my balls..” – Ying Yang Twins - This gets girls dancing like strippers and skinny white ginger kids to think they are Dr Dre. It is awesome (At least the dancing girls)
Well, according to Alicia Hospedales in crimes against children are on the rise, and the government has been quietly dismantling social work and welfare projects that can assist in these situations…..So think about little Aaliyah now, who, according the forensic report was beaten to death…. This is going to happen again and again partly because this society is very sick and partly because very few systems are properly enabled to deal with these issues….when last you hear about the trial against the two boys that killed Sean Luke? I done talk….it have work for Verna to do, you know….it have work for Verna to do.
filtered water
Contains: some dark scenes, some suggestive narration but very mild in my opinion.
Lawrence Patrick Dickinson, 35, Morganville, N.J.
The flip side of this success story is that “Homefield” is not just the first short story I ever published, it’s also the last. About a month before the acceptance letter came I had given up writing fiction as a waste of time. By the time the letter came, I’d had a month for discouragement and laziness to set in and that was that. I’m rather ashamed of throwing in the towel, but there it is.
The cadets will take the skills they develop in the cyber program to their careers in the Air Force.
“But what if there are not many orders for my book after all? If all the copies that are ordered are covered by the first print run and then there are only a few copies ordered after that, when will the rest of the 1,500 copies of my book – which I have already paid for – be published? And why haven’t even the first few orders been sent out yet?” he asked.
That was one of those moments when I thought my eyeballs would fall out of my head because my eyes were open so damn wide. I imagine cuddling me may have been similar to cuddling a tree, a very rigid tree with very awkwardly placed branches.
I added, (as a trifling jest,)
6. William loves to play on the computer. He loves Roblox, and he creates awesome stick figure movies. He also spends a lot of time watching You-Tube reviews of toys he hopes to get.
What is that thing? Obviously we humans have a rich metaphorical relationship to it… but it is something that I’m not really closely in touch with.
'My money's as good as anyone else's,' he would have hissed, running his fingers through blue black hair and staring out from a face still little
I need myself. If I have any relationship, physically, with another guy I will regret it… I will cry, I will be upset and down. Even more lonelier… Maybe I can do what others have told me… Be a whore and become empty inside… I don’t know anymore…
We’ll all race out to the bus. I’ll arrive too early panicked that we won’t get our stuff in time and then have 35 minutes to warm-up, stretch a little and get in the groove.
The heart and the eye and the earth-dusted boot heel, all are drawn to the places in between
5, Bake for 10 to 15 minutes until golden brown and then remove them from the oven and allow them to cool on the baking sheets.
Directed by: Eli B. Despares and Kim Roberts
“I should look at this…ah…painting on the wall…pretend to look deep in thought.”
Nel tuo paese? In your town?
Kemp’s last meal was cheeseburger, fries and root beer; boysenberry pie with strawberry ice cream
“Peer always thinks he isn’t brave. But he is brave. He’s the bravest person I ever met.”
“Six, I have six hours left.”
Happy Monday! :o)
Now this part is probably the weirdest, most disguting thing ive ever written about. Righ the story is i was on the train, was just a normaly boring journey, when suddenly this smell wafted down the carriage. However this smell was the smell to choke all smells haha it smelt like something had died, been left to rot then eaten by an animal and shat back out. I couldnt quite figure out where it was coming from. Then this old man walked past where i was sitting, the smell seemed to follow him and as he past i turned round to look, only too see that he had litterally pooped himself on the train!!! bleughhhhhh that ruined my journey........
Not long ago I participated in an online discussion which considered the role of theology in Christian ministry on the web. The conversation was, in many ways, startling. For one thing, the role of theology was (by some) impugned as worthless and indeed inimical to Christian faith in our era. For another, during the discussion there were moments of open hostility and contempt. The whole thing, despite being conducted under the auspices of a Christian group discussing Christian ministry, felt remarkably unlike Christianity. The result was profound discomfort on my part.
The words defense, diplomacy and development are called the 3Ds. US officials have claimed they are what AFRICOM will bring to Africa. This is eerily and offensively reminiscent of 19th century colonialism, in which Europe claimed it was bringing the 3Cs to Africa, commerce, Christianity and civilization.
Contact: send resume and leadership experience to Margaret at mlane.llc@gmail.com
God simply replied, "You are what you are."
And boy was it delicious. Layer after layer of cheesy-prosciutto-basil goodness. The flavors were fresh and the red pepper gave it a nice kick. (We added a little extra heat, too.) I actually liked it better than those traditional 800 calorie-packing meaty-monsters you find at restaurants. Even my meat-obsessed husband gobbled up two slices before I could finish mine. (Granted, I was taking pictures.)
George Bernard Shaw
N- nestabilities, the word NOEL
Think Africa Press welcomes inquiries regarding the republication of its articles. If you would like to republish this or any other article for re-print, syndication or educational purposes, please contact:
Have you identified what you really want to do before you die? It’s a complicated decision and mind aching process. But you need to decode it down to paper. But it really is very important and you should invest some time on this, even couple of days is fine.
5) My friend Snad doesn't blog much but she has us over to her house all the time, she got us involved in local activism, and she introduced us to our other friends Brian and June so for all that and much more I'm awarding her one of these thingys as well.
The major spring auctions wrapped up this week in New York with sales that nearly tripled last year's totals. A few artists appeared unaffected by the recent ups and downs of the market. A Picasso painting sold for $106.5 million, setting an auction record, and Andy Warhol's "Self Portrait" sold for $32.5 million, more than twice its high estimate.
Wyle E. Cattle
Amazingly, when I finished the first draft of what would eventually be titled Dreaming Anastasia, Baba Yaga was not a character. In that first version – which actually garnered me an agent! – Anastasia was in some sort of blue light mystical holding zone that Anne and Ethan accessed by discovering a secret portal in Chicago’s Art Institute. Yes, I know – portals? Waaaay over done. But I was a newbie. I’d loved that portal in season 2 of Angel went the gang went to Pylea and saved Fred and Cordy got to briefly become royalty…Excuses, excuses.
“They sell my body to get money. They let old-man or pervert guy rape me heartlessly. They don’t care to my scream, my crying. No matter how I beg them to help me and let me go, they won’t help. They don’t appreciate me a human being.”I let my tears come out. The first tears since I decide to accept my dirty life.
So as unschoolers, we missed out on internalizing any siblings-are-uncool-and-so-is-anyone-younger-than-me messages. But far more than that, we simply had the time to become such good friends!
Bonk (Norton, $24.95) delves into the long and sordid history of sexual physiology, covering ground cleared by everyone from Leonardo da Vinci (an alleged cold fish who regarded human coitus as “awkward and disgusting”) to Alfred Kinsey (whose illuminating experiments were often carried out in the attic of his home). The phrase “too much information” has no bearing on these exposés of everything from animal insemination to penile implantation: Does clitoral placement dictate the propensity for female orgasm? Will paralysis spell the end for one’s sex life? Could masturbation serve as a cure for the hiccups? Roach delves into each avenue with characteristic fervor, occasionally transforming herself and her long-suffering husband into guinea pigs for the researchers she investigates. (Her tale of kinky sex inside an MRI machine is likely to resonate the next time you go in for a CAT scan.)
But Ugh.. the thought of her even mentioning the MM.. that is what Mark had.. and that made me feel very sad to revisit the many scans he went through.. but I only sat in the waiting room, I wasn't with him.
3 Nyctalopia 3
Keziah, I love your name. Can you tell me what it means?
Tar Wars is a tobacco-free education program for fourth- and fifth-grade students. The program is designed to teach kids about the short-term, image-based consequences of tobacco use, the cost associated with using tobacco products, and the advertising techniques used by the tobacco industry to market their products to youth.
Hello again! Yes I am back with another post so soon, did you see my Birthday card that I made for my boss? If not scroll down and check it out once you have read this post.
I was ambivalent about the idea of being addicted to myself (it even sounds weird!), so asked my friend who is a psychologist in real life. He verified the concept. We all have these addictions, and they go back to childhood. It really got me to thinking about my strongest feelings growing up and how they reappear in my life all these decades later. I have to worry – that’s my drug of choice. And then I have to feel safe and protected to balance all that worrying. I’ve seesawed between those two emotions most of my life. I have a pretty straightforward (and probably common) pair of addictions there. There are others I'm discovering as I moodle this concept.
(end of Wolfe statement)
juice from 1 meyer lemon
In 1990, social workers agreed to put her in contact with Linda, who is now 58. She was still living in Slough and had kept the two sons she’d had with Dawn’s father Owen, 64 — Paul, 41, and David, 36.
AWP: What childhood experience has served you many times?
Now, let's say you don't wear makeup or don't like makeup brushes.
The AA-12 has yet to be used in combat. Russian missiles, historically, have been less reliable and effective than their Western counterparts. The Russian missiles are not worthless they are just less likely to knock down aircraft they are aimed at. The Chinese saw flaws in the AA-12 and wanted to improve that design so that it is more competitive with AMRAAM. The Chinese were eager to create an effective competitor for AMRAAM that they could export (they are already offering the export version of the, the SB-10, for sale.) Their PL-12 has, so far, not demonstrated any extraordinary abilities.
And then, same old story. These two albums received very good reviews... but very poor sales. For some time both LPs, specially the first one, could be seen on the bargain bins of many shops. Until they vanished. Laurie also vanished. Seen her results in the record world, and also in the sentimental world after splitting from Mr. Murphy, she went back to USA and little or nothing has been heard from her ever since. Only that she died about ten years ago. Her two albums have never been reissued and no music magazine seems to have ever had any feature about her. Our humble homage to Laurie.
Since I haven’t been in much of a festive mood this year, I decided to force myself into holiday joviality by drinking. A lot. A real lot. Basically, I’ve been bombed two weekends in a row, with plans to make it a trifecta of drunkenness this weekend.
Chamille has a sign on her door that she's had up for 5 or 6 yrs that says "everything in life has the potential to be funny", then a "stop" sign, then underneath the word "stop" it says "hating smart asses". I love the double entendre! I think that idea can apply to lots of things in life!
My tree wasn’t far from my home. It was just down the trail from my front door and could easily be seen through our window panes. Stepping off of my porch it was merely a dash of ten seconds at top speed, which is often how I ran to the tree. Once there, I would kick off my shoes (which I barely needed anyway since it was so close, except that the path was rocky) and I would climb the lower branches that gradually wrapped upward around the back of the tree until I was able to slide down a main trunk onto a set of branches that led straight to the top as if they were purposely designed to give access to the feet of children. I would only have to dodge a branch here and there before I was at the top. And there I would sit in a crook of several branches that had grown together to form a cradle. Resting quietly, it took Mother’s call for a midday meal to rouse any interest in returning to the world below. In fact, it is possible that I would have gone hungry had she not beckoned my return.
Now, you might ask why I don't use Broom for the commute? Well, it's because the mornings are too light now to go flying around for all and sundry to see. Plus, the Civil Service doesn't take too kindly to witchcraft, for some reason, and therefore doesn't provide the requisite landing facilities for non-VTOL (Vertical Take Off & Landing, for those not in the know) brooms.
And I SOBBED into the phone that I had been sent there for giggling, and now I was SURE that my mother wouldn't let me go on the Girl Scout Camping Trip that was scheduled to leave that afternoon, after school.
Review here. I went through phases of love and hate with this. Overall, it's okay. I wish it didn't have alcohol in it, but none the less I can't see myself purchasing it again.
Q: ‘Herbivore’ man is really popular in Japan, what kind of man do you think you are?
Not a boy and a bit in the wick-
Cold drinks, and I have verified this with our empleada, Ethel, are considered to be unhealthy as they lower the body’s ability to fend off illnesses. At least that’s her story and she’s sticking to it.
Have you ever wondered exactly how you would react in a real crisis, where lives might be on the line? Do you imagine yourself being all cool, calm and collected, saving the children and the pregnant women first and sacrificing yourself for the greater good? Well, here was my reaction:
Rand Merchant Bank came to the rescue, buying Pambi’s entire stake in Pamodzi — by then worth about R22-million — and transferring an 8% stake in Pamodzi to Pambi as fully paid-up shares.
Again, I would like to appalled all those that worked tirelessly to make this happen and repeat the words of Chief Allan Adam when we first heard the news of the rejection of the pipeline this January:
Only having to get myself to one appointment made a big difference to my day. I was able to fit in an early nap, cope with scooter hoisting in the rain, and having previously met Dr Breathe I wasn't overwhelmed with "they think it's all in my head" anxiety.
crayons
And recently, Jake was having a difficult time remembering himSelf accurately, because of my description. He asked for more clarity: "Was I ALWAYS really serious??"
I hope if nothing else, my review makes you go read the book itself. It’s available at Amazon and not expensive ($2.99). I know I have at least a few friends with Kindle’s who’d enjoy it. It was a great, easy and fun book to read. I hope you enjoy as well.
There’s a big difference between writing Teen fiction, and writing for teens.
According to an online article, entitled A Brief History of Terrorism, dated July 2, 2003, and compiled by Mark Burgess (CDI Research Analyst), scholars have greatly disputed in what exact era the roots of terrorism actually originated. I find this rather odd considering the fact that the biblical Book of Genesis, which documents certain portions of ancient history with amazing clarity and detail, clearly shows that the first act of murderous terror occurred when the satan child Cain murdered his brother Abel (Genesis 4:8). As a consequence of this vile deed Cain was banished to the East of Eden, but the story did not end there.
I'm going to Ikea with my Bella to scope out utility room thingys. Wish me luck because WAH? We're going to Ikea on a SUNDAY? We must have a screw loose.
"Just Crack, Cook & Twist"
And, we learned in March that when your running is going fine, don't jump in with both feet into your new low/zero drop shoes (Brooks PureFlow for me), no matter how sexy and alluring they are, especially when you are used to training in Brooks Adrenaline and you have a tendency for tight calves, Achilles, and plantar fascia.
The backs of the cards don't quite align up if you place them flush against each other, they are cut to allow a tiny border space for placing and displaying in a binder as I said above. If they were framed and mounted with perfect alignment the image would look like you are viewing Ms. Hope through a window. My scan of the backs isn't perfect but its close maybe I should have tried scanning it in a binder page.
And the pain of that will never, ever, ever, ever go away... because the loss of that dream is a very very significant loss.
So then we went back to the ego thing. My ego is causing me problems. She asked me if I really wanted to work on listening to my Soul and less on my ego. She noted that deep down, I’m afraid of losing control. Afraid of what will happen when I simply let go. However, despite these fears, I would say that I want to continue on this path. I want to see where it leads. I want to ‘jump off the cliff’ as it were. I don’t like that I always seemingly need to be in control. That I have to have my fingers in everyone’s pies. I don’t want to be that person that micromanages everything and everyone in a 5 mile radius. I just don’t want that. And while it might be scary, it might be a bit nerve wracking, I’d like to see where this leads. She then asked my soul if it was ‘ready to do war’. Apparently it is, and it seems this will be the next chapter of work for me.
Located in the City National Plaza tower, Drago Centro is a little hard to find while driving (don't do what I did and circle 5 times - get specific directions here).
Ralph Gonnocci Revocable Living Trust v. Three M Tool & Mach. Co., 68 U.S.P.Q.2d 1755, 1758 (E.D. Mich. 2003) - "This action has been pending for less than a year. Undoubtably the parties have spent considerable time and resources thus far - substantial discovery has been conducted and the parties have submitted witness lists and three lengthy summary judgment motions. Yet far more time and resources remain to be spent before this matter is concluded. Two responses to motions for summary judgment must be submitted, the Court has not begun to review those motions, and much remains to be done by the parties and the Court to prepare this case for trial.”
So ended my saga…..
I don’t understand why Nick didn’t ask Wu what he ate because you don’t encounter a hex every day. Inadequate detective work once again. The other mediocre detective called Hank is having dreams and hallucinations of Adalind. This is getting interesting!
The companies that make new barrels are called cooperages but so are the companies that deal in used barrels. The two main makers of new barrels are Brown-Forman Cooperage and Independent Stave Company (ISC). ISC does not deal in used barrels, but Brown-Forman does.
2/3 cup sugar syrup (see below)
Around every corner there is often a surprise, and I had just photographed a beautiful structure that has plagued me for years. It was a small surprise, and I will show you that soon. And it's just a short trip around the corner, Not Under the Gowanus :)
I recently read H.G.Wells’ The Island of Doctor Moreau (1896) and as I started reading more about sci-fi, I was surprised that writers and researchers only seem to discuss his novel The Time Machine (1895) at length instead of Doctor Moreau. Apparently, the book wasn’t well received: critics though that Wells was just feasting on blood and horrible details (the book tells of a scientist who experiments on animals in an attempt to make them more human). It was seen to be in bad taste and was apparently not printed that often until much later on. But Wells is an interesting writer because there are many layers to his story. Not only is he writing about animals that are being vivisected – that’s only the first layer. He’s also exploring human nature: what sets us apart from the animals? We have the same urges and desires that we just keep under control with the help of laws, social rules and religion. If we were left without any guidance and leadership, would there be full anarchy and would we give in to our desires? It’s very much about our dual nature, a sort of Jekyll & Hyde story as well as a reprimand against taking science too far: once you start playing God you’ve crossed the line and will be punished.
School was around the corner, and it was time for our annual trip to the water park in East Lansing to have one last taste of summer. Mom, Amy, Cole, Kimberly, Tommy, Benjamin, Mary Jo, Grant, Brandon, Madison and I were all there.
today, i've been exploring mixed media painting techniques for customized background papers and i want to share some of them with you.
If anything, I'm learning what to do and NOT to do when it comes time to potty train Kaelin. Afterall, parenthood is a learning experience..right? Why does it feel like a race & competition? By far this is the most challenging stage we have had to deal with. I'm sure we'll look back on it some day and laugh but right now...holy freaking cow! Phew!
Some GOP Senators are livid that Sarah Palin and her Sancho Panza, Jim DeMint, cost them control of the upper house, while leaders of both are stuck with contradictory promises to cut spending and taxes yet somehow stimulate the economy. Sound bites for disaffected voters, meet reality.
Yes, Virginia, there really is a Santa Claus!
- Inappropriately presented work will not be accepted.
Love needs to be fed. Nurtured. Nourished. It needs to be deeply felt.
I feel somewhat qualified to speak on the subject of worry. Having had literally decades of experience on the subject. And coming from a long line of very seasoned worriers, none the least of which is my father. Who… were worrying an Olympic event would be the reigning undefeated Gold Medal Champion.
I have a wonderful, yet occasionally drooly and dirty Chocolate Lab and need an easy to clean area rug!
Chizuko Judy Sugita de Queiroz was nine years old when her family was forced to sell their home in Orange County, CA in order to report to internment in Poston, AZ. Her dad sold his bonsai nursery to Walter Knott, of Knott's Berry Farm, with an agreement that he could buy it back after the war. When they returned in 1946, Walter Knott failed to honor his contract. Her dad lost all of the stock to his business, and their personal possessions had been stolen.
I have to give myself props though. Growing up, a few friends knew this fear of mine and one of their brothers dressed up as an oompa loompa for Halloween. He kept singing to me and had me cowering in the corner till I'd had enough.
But this photo pretty much sums it up. ( sorry Wes ,but I HAD to post it)
For one, i want to be a rapper, and a model, and a makeup artist, but now that i think about it, just accomplishing one of these would make me so happy.
I wore a pink shirt.
R says lots of words these days. Some are easy to understand like mama or dada. Others are more difficult like burr, which means bear or waaa which is water or drink.
First, let's take a look at our Design Team's interpretations:
She also allegedly exchanged sexually explicit messages with the teenager and they talked about running away together, court documents stated.
While watching Take Shelter, I couldn’t help but feel that 2011 was the year of the highbrow apocalypse movie – though in truth, perhaps it was only this film and Melancholia that really made it seem so. Here, what begins as a portrait of Curtis, a man spinning into madness (played by none other than Michael Shannon, who could probably teach a master class in crazy at the ripe old age of 36), becomes a film of surprising depth, one that not only captures the uncertainty and unpredictability just under the surface of daily life, but that also asks how we might react to a modern-day prophet.
“All alone and lonely oh! I’m all alone and lonely oh!”
Could barely grasp a basketball,
Cry Terror! is available in the US as a DVD-R from the Warner Archives, but it’s also out as a pressed disc in Spain from Llamentol. The Spanish release boasts a nice tight anamorphic widescreen transfer that’s in pretty good shape. The only extra included is the theatrical trailer, and the Spanish subtitles can be switched off from the main setup menu. On the whole, the film works well enough as a suspense drama. The idea of an ordinary guy being duped into a nightmarish situation that starts to spiral out of his control strengthens its credentials as a late entry into the fading noir cycle. Plot holes and logical inconsistencies can be found in many a movie, so I can live with those. I think the biggest fault is the script’s failure to stick with the plight of the hostage family and instead take regular detours charting the progress of the FBI investigation. It upsets the balance of the picture and lessens the tension at the wrong moments. Even so, the end product is still satisfying enough. Worth checking out, especially if you can get the very reasonably priced Spanish release.
I doubt I would be alive now.
If there is one word that has marked the first ten years of this new century in Paris it is ‘Bobo’. The city has become the playground of the young bourgeois/bohemian, a reasonably well off character who nevertheless tries to have a social conscience and live in an unostentatious manner. I readily admit that I am one of them.
66. The symbols + (addition) and – (subtraction) came into general use in 1489.
Chastity prays for me, piety sings,
Once dough is done resting, paint with water and using a sharp knife make longitudinal slashes on the loaf. Using pizza peel slide baguette onto stone, or place parchment paper with baguette onto overturned baking sheet. Pour 1 cup hot water into baking pan and close door immediately. Bake for 25 minutes.
1) A deep love for the Lord, dependence on the Holy Spirit and sustained immersion in Scripture. Preaching is a deeply spiritual task and the godliness of the preacher shines through whether they intend it or not!
For media information, contact: Alex Fernandes Deputy Head of Communications Queen Mary,
In fact, I'm going to the library today to renew my card since it expired.
Edward Calderon, 44, Jersey City, N.J.
What makes a pair of black pants different on one person than another is about how the garment is styled to reflect their personality.
And in beauty we always find a truth
The first thing I know is, wow! I had no clue that fiction, specifically science fiction, introduced so many ideas to the world. I mean, I knew that science fiction was responsible for some stuff. I figure we all knew that. But I had no idea it introduced SO MANY THINGS. You think I talked about a lot? You should see the list of things I didn't talk about! What amazed me most was how many of them, especially the stuff about space travel, tied directly back to the fiction with people saying, "I was inspired by this." That's pretty amazing, if you ask me. And I'm really glad my wife made this suggestion, because it was all very interesting and good research.
Is there anyone else out there as impatient as me? Do you do things and then realize it would have been smarter to just take a step back and do it right the first time rather than rushing it? Anyone else out there use the magnetic paint and have some tips?
I do most of my tempo runs along River Road/Eastern Avenue. I do simple out-and-back runs and I know where all the mile markers are. It’s flat, so I can achieve consistent times across the tempo miles. It’s also the final portion of the marathon course. As Sun Tzu says, “know thy enemy.” I like to be familiar with the course, especially the part at which I’ll be most fatigued.
This clone of me was from 13 years in the future and did not look a day older, except he (me?) had shaved all the hair off his head. I am not sure about me pulling a Telly Sevalis. Anyway, he (me) told me that he had traveled back in time to warn me about how I would be killed, and then cloned.
The feelings of isolation leaves me rather bad.
Please leave a separate comment for each entry. This giveaway will close on Saturday, December 10 at midnight central time. After a random drawing, the lucky winner will be announced both here and on the Shopaholic In Alabama Facebook page on Sunday, December 11. Good luck in the giveaway!
Her story highlights not only the horrific human rights abuses at the hands of Indian security forces but, in a variety of ways, illuminates the collective experience of the majority of the population of Chhattisgarh, and indeed of a wide swathe of central India. Until recently, this region of deep forests and beautiful mountains, which includes not only Chhattisgarh but also the states of Odisha, Jharkhand, Madhya Pradesh, and Andhra Pradesh had been ignored by India’s engines of “development.” Similarly to colonial times, still today there are few schools or hospitals and malnutrition levels in these states are some of the highest in the world.
The aggressive spirit is admirable but good navigation is also a valuable survival trait. The RE8 in the opening moves found itself at the same altitude and veering into the path of one of Pierre's N17 comrades. Clear thinking is required to avoid a tragic mistake, pity about the distraction of these German fellows who made an appearance (see below). Three single-seaters (at least two Albatross DIII's) and the infamous "Pink Terror" a Roland "Whaleback" I am told.
Eventually, he was able to eat dinner at the table politely. He went back into the self-loathing after dinner and I scooped him up and carried him to the recliner (and let me tell you, he is a little small for his age but my days of being able to pull that off are numbered!) and I rocked him in the recliner. I didn't say much at first, just more "I love you. You are beautiful to me" stuff. Eventually I thought he was at a place where we could talk about it a little more deeply, so I reminded him of the attachment cycle we have been studying. I reminded him he was born perfect and beautiful and healthy. And that when he was very very little, before he even remembers, he started to believe he was bad, he started to believe he was no good. (at which point he said "It's true!!!") and I said no, it's not true. I am telling you the truth. You have believed those things your whole life, and it is hard to let go of things you have believed that long, even if they are lies. But the truth is you were born perfect, and I think you still are.
We've had some members leave us and some new ones arrive, so maybe take a few moments to share some things about you.
“Instead of losing jobs, we’re creating them. Over 4.2 million so far,” it says, before acknowledging that “we’re not there yet … it’s still too hard for too many.” But “we’re coming back.”
Through the moonlit woods, over the snowy hill, toward home.
The above scenario is typically a weekly occurrence and happens to everybody. All the time. Quite how Chinese supermarkets turn a profit is a mystery. And nobody complains. Harmony would somehow fall apart if people complained at such idiotic practices. So, basically, when in China accept that your dinner plans probably won’t work out every day. (Like when you plan an Indian meal around an imported packet of spices… BASTARDS!!! Ange)
If you do not have a good credit rating, consider requesting that your bank reduce your credit limit. Do this only if you can trust yourself to keep a lower balance. It would be bad if you lowered your credit limit and your current balance maxed out the new limit.
God, of the substance of the Father, begotten before the worlds; and Man of the substance
I am praying for you.”
Good Morning! I hope every one had a wonderful week and have some fun plans for the weekend which hopefully involves creating! I myself have a lot of neglected cleaning to do yuck! But we do have a Birthday party on Saturday to celebrate our daughter Jenn's 28th Birthday. It was just yesterday I was changing her diapers and feeding her from a spoon. sigh... Where does the time go?
Didn't they do a great job?! Be sure to click over to each of their blogs - some even have more than one project and I know they can't wait to see what you think!! See you back here tomorrow at the same time! Thanks so much for stopping by this morning!
Sinn Fein said any change in procedures must have Executive approval and no approval had been given.
Cuisine: grilled lemongrass chicken & vermicelli / see below for marinade.
Yes it is going fast.. he met T yesterday and he also met kiddo, who decided to grill him with questions. But he was fine with it and enjoyed N's questions. Then she said to him once she was satisfied "ok you're turn, Dazzle me". LOL
All is not well. You would know that if we were friends (which we are certainly NOT, thank the gods), or even acquaintances on good terms.
As humans we are playing gods over everything and everybody what is in the realm of our power. As scientists we are playing gods over our objects of research; as parents we are playing gods over our children; as managers we are playing gods over our employees. When we are playing god over our dog the dog is trying to figure out what we are demanding from him in order to accommodate our demands and make his life easier; when we are playing god over our child he/she is learning how to behave to make the life more enjoyable; when we are playing god over somebody who is working for us this person is accommodating our demands to make his work more productive and therefore to make more money.
Now, you would think that, after several years as a multipara, I would be used to the barrage that greets me every morning. But I am not. I don't think I ever shall be. The Proverbs 32 woman doesn't really want to be spoken to first thing in the am. She likes to gradually begin her day, preferably with no conversation until she has had a strong cup of coffee.
It never can be; I know and see,
Writing.
Men who suffer from prostate cancer may start to breathe a little easier now that encouraging news has been released on a new form of treatment.
Therapist: What is up? I can always say I can’t.
Do you have a bad luck/good luck story to share?
Thickening agent: I use cornstarch rather than flour, you can use either but I prefer cornstarch as I think it works better.
Outside, the glorious spring day greeted her brightly. Hannah turned her face skyward and almost lost her grip on the basket as she soaked in the warm sunshine. What a glorious spring it was going to be! It felt so good to be young and alive.
Udder Delights' cheese making courses are run on the premises as well as through the WEA. The one day WEA courses are by far the most affordable at $99 per person, and this year they are being held at Loreto College, 316 Portrush Road, Marryatville (Adelaide, SA).
This does not bode well for when we have actual children.
Somehow, impossibly, those women were acknowledging our American tragedies, after all the catastrophes they had seen and suffered in their lives. “To us,” I stammered, humbled, unable to think of anything more to say. And I raised my paper cup with them, those tough old broads, those Great Patriotic War veterans. With a tableful of war heroes, I drank a toast to the disasters life doles out, to misfortunes we all share and must learn to survive.
I am holding this class on Saturday 17th at 10.30am and Wednesday 21st at 10am if you would like to attend. Class cost is $25 and is all inclusive. All welcome, but please email me if you would like to attend so I can prepare at kit for you.
North Coast Old Rasputin Russian Imperial Stout
But anyway…
All of these events are prompting people to plan street parties.
wheat bread
From a man's point of view, or should I say my point of view, boring routine, same thing everyday could be the reason. You get up, you go to work, you come home, you eat, you sleep, you get up, you go to work...blah blah, blah fish paste. You basically live right past each other.
“The white ‘Mondrian’ lines represent the linear boundaries between many countries in Africa. The colours reflect the colours used in many african flags today and the black handprint (Charondrians’s own) a metaphor for landgrab from both whites and blacks. The Elephant, as a species, will probably live on Earth forever. The spots suggest conflicts and trouble spots – but also hint that the fumes from the vandalpaint spray cans favoured by the ‘artist’ may have been getting the better of Charondrian.”
I managed to choke down another partial plate of food (mmm...fried turkey!) somehow, and had a couple margaritas. I ended up coming on back home, instead of playing poker into the evening, as the children were plainly just NOT in a place to sit and watch a video in peace. I wasn't too harsh on them, as they were pretty fried from staying up too late the night before, when we were over t' the Noxiouses' house.
Summer, Jerry, and I are going on a train trip to Santa Barbara on Thursday with about 120 other homeschoolers. So that should be really fun. Oh, and I almost forgot to mention that I have canned my first jar of beans (which Jerry actually ate--and liked!) and have made strawberry jam!! Summer and I went to a canning class last week taught by one of the homeschool moms. It was so fun. And so much easier than I thought it would be! I even bought a used pressure canner for $10 on Craigslist. It needs a couple parts, but once I get those I'll be canning up a storm!
Hope to see you guys sooner than later! And thanks for sticking around with me =)
I knew the members would go gaga over this as i did, so i went a bit crazee and took some promo photos (below) and on the way back home sent smses to all members informing them of an impromptu class to learn this beautiful tradition embroidery work and to checkout our Facebook for the pictures by 10pm. I told them just come & bring black cloth, some needles &a cushion. Why a cushion? You'll see....
all suggestions/links gratefully received......
For me, the idea of a yellow kitchen conjures up images of the "harvest gold" appliances I grew up with. While I would find a soft cream more livable than all over yellow, the bright lemony pops in these photos add an unexpected, yet tasteful hit. If you're daring enough to invest in a colored appliance, click here to see the full range of gorgeous hues Bertazzoni has to offer.
This was the prayer that I wrote as I prepared to leave Palos Heights, Illinois in January to live for four months in Montego Bay, Jamaica. It was based on two Psalms, 1 and 27.
Unlike most bloggers, I'm not much of a writer, either. My Twitter feed is forever telling me that fellow bloggers and people I follow are writing, and as much as I'd like to be able to write as a hobby, I have neither the stamina nor the time- particularly now, when my blog takes up a lot of my free time. I've been told on numerous occasion that I'm a reasonable writer- and on the one-off event that I do write, what I produce isn't always that bad. YA fiction has affected my writing, if ever so slightly- I now know what works, what has been done, and as a reviewer, I know exactly what I want from a book. Perhaps, one day, that'll all help me craft my own novel- but for now, that knowledge remains largely unused, only on the rarity coming out to critique other people's work.
Remember the BP oil spill of 2010? 4,9 million barrels of crude oil spilled into the Gulf of Mexico. And two years later, the fishing industry of Louisiana is collapsing. That is what happens when government deregulates and corporations are left to their own devices.
It all makes sense. Lindzi was a punishment for his parents raising him to like horses and giving him the name Harold. I mean, there’s no cowboy named Harold Cox. That guy fucks up your tax return. Harry Cox might be a cowboy, but the other cowboys piss in his beer, which is why he bought a ranch in fucking Ocala, Florida, had one daughter and hid her from society so that she bonded with horse more than man.
I'm entering this card in the following challenges
...but he wouldn't let me bring it home!
CM
Haroon the dwarf, not in the least put out by his short stature; he thinks his height gives him an advantage - he can easily bite people’s kneecaps.
"We started our company ... because we wanted to create a product where we knew the ingredients were pure, made with intention and care, and reflected a quality and freshness that we had not yet found in other products."
I'm a big fan of the altered artwork featured on JABBERWOCKY. With a blog title like that, you know that talented artist Sue Roddis is an Alice fan through and through. She began this amazing creation as an entry for the Oh, Alice! challenge to use bling, but it took a bit longer to make than expected and she missed the deadline. Well, I am so proud to say that Sue gave The Altered Alice permission to feature her "mixed media steampunk book/necklace/thingy" which is, indeed, indescribable.
Buster loved her. I’m sure he felt that we’d brought her home just for him. At the time we had no intentions at all of raising puppies; in fact, for some reason the possibility never even occurred to us (stupid, I know). But on July 5th, 1995, Gabby had her litter of ten healthy, beautiful pups (her last litter, because we spayed her as soon as possible afterward). Since we couldn’t possibly keep all ten of them, we settled on just one — Pinkie.
The instinct to cull the weakest of their herd runs strong in this soul-less brood, for when they sense weakness in one of their numbers, any chance for this one to enjoy life and be left in peace is at an end.
"Do you want to get some coffee?" He fumbles with the words, and as soon as they're out of his mouth, he wishes he hadn't said them.
Suddenly recognizing the situation, the teller replied, “I’m sorry sir, that’s an awful country diction. You can’t make a deposit with drawl. You must be an oxymoron.”
A: Fans get to vote for the white or black Michael Jackson.
I also don’t know if I’m a little annoyed that Yi Gak just plans to use her this way. I guess they’ve softened the blow by not making her fall in love with him for real but he really just plans on marrying her and disappearing back to Joseon. That’s so not cool.
I left the office with a bag full of goodies, and a smile on my face. My liver was good. So what is today, February 15th? I guess I can only get drunk 2 more times this year because I celebrated Friday night!
Cake & collage. Collage was made by my cousin, and it's really cute! Pictures throughout my pregnancy and our wedding picture.
To Participate in This Event:
My friend Josée showed me her new Bella stamps, the Uptown Girls (you can see the whole collection on Stamping Bella's here.) The one I used is Uptown Girl POSH has a present.
I also have zits. It's not pretty. I put on make up and red lipstick and pretend that I don't look like Big Marsh covered in partridge berries(only the Newfoundlanders, specifically the Change Islanders will get this reference but I'm using it anyway) , but I think it's just the change in the weather because summer is coming!
Baked Goods
My Dad had moved and was working the U.S. for some time. The plan was for my Mom to go down there with him after their house here in Canada sold. In the meantime, my Mom had packed up their whole house and all the bills had been pared down to the absolute basics. Internet and all those pesky things, like water, electricity and gas. They had the satellite disconnected because my Dad is the tv watcher in the house....and well, he was gone.
Please check the buyer reviews & ratings of Forever Rest Premium Massage Chair BUILT IN HEAT* body scan*(TOP OF THE LINE) 10yr. Warranty (Beige Carmel) at the merchant’s website by click on the link below.
Working on a holiday in The Space Between Raindrops. There will be some changes coming and going as I freshen things up a bit.
“..regarded as one of Britain’s most original photographers” according to ‘The Times’ and “A woman’s face was exquisitely metamorphosed with the cup of a yellow tulip – a Femme – Fleur Picasso might have perpetrated had he taken to photography” published in ‘Arts Revue’. There were many other newspaper and photographic magazine articles published, because his pictures are not only technically brilliant, but fascinating works of art that even attracted the attention of such famous names as Cecil Beaton C.B.E., Sir William Russell Flint R.A., Sir George F. Pollock Bt., M.A., and Lady Clementine Spencer Churchill amongst many others.
Time for bed.
SH: I don't have it.
(Those of you who are dry-heaving by now should probably just not read the rest of this.)
04 Amore Immaginato (Piero Pelu)
Is your ceiling on the verge of collapse, and you want to prevent fallen sheetrock from gnawing into the small of your back at 3 in the morning? Better see a drywall contractor.
Great Divide Brewing Company Pilsner
My friends walked by me as I watched the last few minutes of the Man City vs West Ham game. I watched them head happily along Leyton High Road towards Stratford. They enjoyed their visit and their beer, and today they've woken up to news that has a special resonance to them, so I think they'll be heading to a pub somewhere to hoist a pint. And it'll be a good pub with good beer.
This is my project - my first scrapbook page (I'm trying to remember when I last made a card!!!).
But I knew the moment I got there
It is the book. It was the genesis and yes, it’s loaded thematically. My original title was Castle of Cards. Worlds built on lies, crumbling castles, political intrigue, personal relationships, identity, the king’s own fragile emotional state – it all refers back to that first image. And then there’s the climactic scene …
But also wanted to drop a few lines about today’s visit to Universal – Florida. The girls, who read aloud the first Harry Potter title on the way here, particularly enjoyed the Wizarding World of Harry Potter found at Universal’s Islands of Adventure.
As a bi-product of creating the new pasture, Sergio also took on a partner and entered the charcoal production business. The wood that is not suitable for lumber is used to make charcoal in clay ovens. Once this wood is added to the oven it takes around 12 hours to turn into charcoal and remains in the oven for an additional six to ten hours before it can be removed. The ranch is currently operating 60 ovens. Under their arrangement Sergio’s partner was responsible for clearing all the land and they split the profits in half on any wood that could be used as lumber, but the partner receives all the profits from the charcoal production. They are currently in year three of a four year contract. The charcoal is used in factories involved with steel production.
continued singing their harmonized, hypnotic lullaby that lasted hours.
Su Kuang Hong, also says that the police car driver was still conscious
And this was me preparing for my Tarot reading gig:
Today was my day off and once again, I spent part of it in the doctor’s office. I have to get a bunch of blood tests done next week, so it’s another journey to Sun City for that. I had planned on going to the library today but after shopping and dealing with the heat (it was at least 100 again for the 3rd day in a row), I just wanted to go home, get some lunch and sleep. So I had a nice nap and will hit up the library tomorrow. Today, even though I had it written on my calendar, I had forgotten it was St George’s Day. Since my hubby is English, we like to celebrate it. He’s the patron saint of both Greece and England, and according to this website, he is also the patron saint of “Barcelona in Catalonia, Aragon, Russia, Bavaria, Beirut, Czechoslovakia, Portugal, Lithuania and Hungary.” Here are some facts taken from the same website:
The curtains are actually just drop cloths that I bought at Home Depot. The guy probably thought I was kinda strange going through all their boxes of drop cloths, but I needed 4 that were all the same color. If you ever try to make these, be aware that all drop cloths are not identical! The drop cloths are nice because they are fairly inexpensive and are already hemmed around the edges! Then I just found a trim that I liked at Wal-Mart and used heat and bond hem tape to iron it on the top on the backside. I folded down the tops and used clips to hang them on the rods. Now we finally have a finished and cozy family room!
The great thing about entertaining your kids during the winter is that you get to be a kid again. You make forts, run with sleds (geezus I'm tired), kick up snowstorms with your boots and pretend that the icicles are magic crystals that Tinkerbell and her sidekicks need to make winter arrive on time. Or something. It was an elaborate plot. I got confused.
This traffic office claims he was in defensive mode, as he was under attack.
The latest outrage from the anti-Israel (and mostly antisemitic) BDS (boycott, divestment, sanctions) movement comes from the British Co-op supermarket stores. (h/t Times of Israel who provided a link to the BDS-ers website, which I will not do here so as not to give them the traffic they desire).
You should by now have read the first two prescribed sections of Nietzsche.
1. What did you register for that you found the most helpful or use a bunch?
“It would include a variety of different trades where welding is a significant component,” co-investigator Dr Jeremy Beach, associate professor with the UoA, says of the study.
*2 bay leaves, *dried
Aside from working and making music several hours a day,
Ummm...Okay? I guess...
On the plus side I have subbed a new story to TWN and have two ready to post off to PF, so I haven't completely wasted the weekend.
Don't comment unless you're actually golfing at the time. Actually don't even read the above point unless you're personally swinging the club, and if you are, let me tell you, according to the etiquette that phone/ laptop/ other wireless device is not supposed to be out if you're swinging. Bad golfer!
His questions gently reminded him of the question was what did he like about the job. Finally, after again listing some dislikes and being confronted again, “Well,” said I in the smallest voice I voice I possess, “I guess what I’d like most is getting my picture in the paper with the word president underneath it.”
The gift that Phil ended up choosing was a bench for
We have this almost endless relentless asskissing and support for even religious value's of some religion's that is just supporting irrational behaviour and degrading to people as well based on gender, sex, culture, other religious affiliation's, etc ... basically nowhere bitching and endless conflict's. This is importante now, because over the last few year's I have seen way too much of this being incorporated into our govenment and politic's ... and THAT is NOT American Value's at all. These people are NOT trying to tell ANYONE what they should believe ... they are just a lil sick and tired of being put down because they dont follow someone else's code who is larger, more powerful and has more money than they need to waste on their agenda's and force feeding American's their value's of what ever cult they may belong to. Enough from me on this ... Mr. Silverman point's out enough.
The last two mornings haven’t been pleasant. Yesterday was simply… tragic. She gets so distressed at the fact that she’s awake even when she wakes up on her own, and then the thought that she has to get out from under the covers. She becomes combative over beginning the routine. She screams insults and edicts, and hurts her own ears and body. I can commiserate on some level since I’m going through a particularly difficult Fibromyalgia flare-up of my own since Sunday. Everything feels excessive to me, and I’m having some trouble handling the physical parts of her lashings out. Today was better for Gracie than yesterday was, and luckily once she does get to school she hops off the bus and actually SKIPS TO CLASS.
react_treat: worked on leave it/take it and did fine. She was fine when I picked up some kibble that was on the ground. Am told she will resource "hard bones" (don't know what that is, I'm guessing similar to a raw or smoked bone)
Although in some ways it's extremely confusing, it's got to be
The first sentence in the paragraph is very long. (One way to know how long is too long is to say the sentence out loud. If you need to pause to breathe, it's too long) I'm also going to quibble with "prostitute" since it's clear she's online, and prostitution requires in-person activity. I know people use "sex worker" but that's not the right phrase either.
There is another layer to this book. We have Alice talking straight to us, we have Cate’s story and then we have a third story, the backstory where we learn where Alice came from and what happened to make her the person she has turned into. Really, the fact that she willingly agreed to be a party to someone’s suicide is one of the least interesting things about her once you learn about her mother and what happened to the two of them, how Alice ended up in care and also how Alice ended up rich: by the end of the book she’s been transformed from merely the accused into a real person. Smith, not so much, although we do learn a lot more about him, but this is Alice’s story.
-The Daydreamer
The Ratner connection
Dubstep innovator and one of the biggest DJs in the genre, Benga is the headliner for The Kane FM presents Funky End Dance Tent on Friday 13th July.
"If Rudolph is magic, then how come the magic doesn't make him not get sick?"
We did spaghetti with whole wheat noodles, salad and garlic toasted english muffins (yummmm).
No overview of Glasgow pubs would be complete without tipping a wink, doffing a cap and singing the praises of the two Old Dames of real ale in Glasgow: The Bon Accord and The Three Judges. Both have a reputation as being the first two pubs to visit if you are looking for a wide range of cask. They usually don't disappoint and you can normally find a few good 'uns among their respective ten beer selections. If i was to quibble, I would say that the reliance on using Flyer and Firkin as beer suppliers sometimes means that the Judges and the Bon have one or two of the same beers on at the same time. It's a minor quibble.
The plot takes its time to develop but its interesting because with each chapter results in an aftermath that is unforgettable, I found the ending in particular does not present a closed ending.
And...as a bonus to all of you out there, on the 28th when we have our first challenge, we will announce a random drawn winner out of all those who visited every single blog (listed at F&F) and left a comment. The winner will receive a $25 gift certificate to the Funkie Junkie Boutique.
These shoes are admittedly less classic than the dress, but they also cost 1/5 the price. They were surprisingly comfortable.
I studied this recording so much and blatantly copped a lot of Carter's methods of getting around cycle of 5ths progressions and ways of making extended minor key passages interesting.
I of course cut this using my Big Shot and the Matchbox Die...so much easier than the way I used to make them...cutting and scoring from scratch! I cut them and then used the Love Blossoms wheel (a carry over item from the Holiday Mini) to stamp the box. As you can see, the jewelry fit perfectly inside the drawers. The "For You" label on the top of the box is the smallest of the Label Framelits.
There’s a great benefit to a beatdown, beyond the pleasure of the beatdown itself, a pleasure, of course, exclusive to the perpetrator: you have the joy of knowing you’re not the victim. You belong, and the victim does not.
Prepare the cinnamon filling: In a medium bowl, stir together the butter, brown sugar and cinnamon. Scoop the filling into a quart-sized heavy zip baggie or a pastry bag and set it aside.
THANK YOU ALL FOR PARTICIPATING! Email me at: youngnester(at)gmail(dot)com and ask for the code for my "I was featured" button! I would love for you to show the world I love you!
Getting outta Scooter Cobb’s house for one thing. I come up with that plan by myself, nobody was slipping me some good escaping suggestions that’s for sure. Okay, I was scared when my foot missed and I started sliding off the roof, but I didn’t give in to screaming or anything; a lot of kids would’ve been yelling for their mama, but not me—yelling for Mama wouldn’t of done me no good anyway.
Keep my hand on my gun 'cuz they got me on the run
Unfortunately, I'm not full of Brim coffee. I am full of sad and I'm praying the phone doesn't ring because I have that golf ball of emotions lodged in my throat and it feels like if I eek out one syllable to speak I'm going to totally lose it. The last eight months have been brutal. I can't Hank Hill my emotions any longer.
*As an aside... it is nearly IMPOSSIBLE to find out how much designer dresses cost! After speaking with one very curt and tight lipped receptionist at Marchesa, an unanswered call to Jenny Packham, and google search after google search, I gave up trying to find the exact prices for these designer gowns. So frustrating! If anyone happens to know, please post it here!
In the beginning of the novel we see the meeting that the overview mentions between Suora Zuana and the new novice Serafina. Apparently, part of Suora Zuana’s duties as the dispensary sister include sedating screaming newbies who freak out and make a lot of noise during their first night in their cell, locked behind convent walls. It seems that this quite even among the women who willingly devout themselves to God. The first night is just too much for them.
Friday night my daughter-in-law, Chrysty, and her folks, and my daughter and her family came over for a full fledge turkey dinner that my hubby de jour (LOL) had prepared for us. There's nothing quite like thanksgiving dinner in March! Everyone enjoyed the subsequent food coma afterwards. My daughter-in-law gave me some amazing gifts that she and Mark had brought back from their travels in Thailand. Some coconut cookies, FRESH pepper from a pepper farm they had visited, and a beautiful necklace handmade by one of the locals. Thanks Mark and Chrysty for these LOVELY and thoughtful gifts!! Chrysty's folks brought me some really lovely fresh flowers which my cats were eying appreciatively! And my daughter and her family gave me THREE HOURS of house cleaning from Merry Maids - I can't wait to have my spring cleaning done FOR ME !!
You might not be next to an ocean, but surely you can find some water around you to take a photo of. #ds9
also grieving
Add coriander, sesame, chilli and turmeric powders mix well. Simmer for 1 or 2 minutes until the flavors blend well, stir in salt, switch off. Goes well with chapathi/rice.
I have used the stamp Egg Painting from Crafty Sentiments Designs. My base paper is actually some sparkly purple paper and overtop of it is some easter paper that I got from Micheals! Can you see how I totally flipped the sketch! I tend to do that!
Her room is all ready for her arrival home....
I'm not saying I have the audience or the talent of Pynchon or Martin, but people often have careers that don't involve a book a year or multiple books a year. And some people do.
red or yellow peppers - I used 3 red peppers
These disappeared FAST.
329 **4. "The mystery of Plutarch's account of Alexander the Great." Greek Star, Chicago, Illinois, May 11, 2000, p. 8, May 18, 2000, p. 7. (Sources: Item D-VIII/20/1990, below; Item C-1999(4), pp. 734-44.)
Because of this silent modus operandi of the Marxist-Leninist terrorists, the rebellious black youths have been growing impatient and they are demanding more definitive action against the whites, they want the whites driven from Africa and exterminated.
And if you´re young and you don’t want to spend too much money, stay in a hostel: You will meet amazing people from all over the globe who will make Berlin definitely worth a trip!
But I DO love this pumpkin pie!!
There are other milongas - these are just the ones I have personally located. I've deleted some London milongas that I know have been cancelled, it's possible others have. I usually won't know about it if I'm not a regular. A blue pin means I've checked the physical location but not been to the event.
Jasmine is Tunisia's national flower. I don't know who first started calling the uprising in Tunisia the Jasmine Revolution, but it must have gained the nickname after the violence in Tunis finally subsided on Wednesday. Someone at the top decided something needed to change. The police maintained a line blocking the Ministry of Interior building, but allowed the protesters to protest. The mood lifted, like a flower suddenly blossoming.
Your lips were so soft, so wanting, so needing
The House of the Spirits, Isabel Allende
“Sorry,” I said. “Sometimes I forget that I’m a freak now.”
SIGH
Pool – we often use a pool when we are away on tour with the Aussies, but I have also been using the local gym pool the day following a match to do some running, dynamic stretching and to try and flush out the sore bits! A heated pool in this case always makes it a lot easier
Favorite Charlottesville Restaurants: While at the Wine Blogger's Conference, I found time to explore a number of restaurants in Charlottesville, Virginia, and I lucked out, finding several worthy places. I compiled a single post, describing the good places that I found, from excellent country fried steak at The Nook to delicious sushi at Ten.
Now our winners which have been drawn by Random org 1st out first sponsor etc are
"I know," she said.
So while I am able, here writing on this preheated computer, I wanted to tell you that the interview I'm posting tomorrow on CALIBER is really cool and you should check it out. I have some "preheated" posts scheduled there so at least there will be something pretty to look at.
Ikea’s popular Klippan sofa was produced in East Germany at a plant situated next to a prison in Waldheim.
In a large, deep skillet or Dutch oven, combine the ground sirloin and ground chicken breast, stirring and breaking up the pieces to combine. Brown the combined meat over medium heat until thoroughly cooked through. (Note: When using leaner meats like ground chicken or turkey breast and/or ground sirloin, it is not necessary to drain and rinse the meat as it is already quite lean. You’ll know that the meat is cooked through when nearly all of the liquid in the bottom of the pan has cooked off.) During the last minute or so of cooking, add the minced garlic and stir to combine; let the garlic cook in the mixture, stirring frequently, for a minute or two. Sprinkle sea salt and freshly ground black pepper over the meat when it is done cooking and stir to combine; remove from the heat.
I just adore Victoria's love of colour and mix of fabrics, which is evident if you follow her on her blog ... and her eclectic style!
The trade deadline came and went, but before it passed the Braves finally made a move. Without giving up any really valuable prospects, the Braves were able to trade for center fielder Michael Bourn from the Astros. They gave up much less than the Phillies did for former Astros outfielder Hunter Pence, but the Braves still gained an impact player who can help them make the playoffs. The Braves needed more help than both the Phillies and Giants, as their offense has been terrible (and underachieving a lot) all season. Their leadoff hitters have hit .254 with an on-base percentage of .306 (pitiful). Bourn fixes that. Center fielders for the Braves have hit .241 with a .322 on-base percentage. Bourn fixes that. He also plays great center field defense, has already stolen 39 bases, and will fit perfectly into Atlanta's lineup. So far in 2011, Bourn is hitting .303/.363/.403 with one home run and 32 RBIs. Sure, Bourn doesn't have the power that Pence or Beltran has, but he doesn't need to because he is a perfect leadoff hitter. Congrats to the Braves for finding someone who should fit seamlessly into their lineup, and for not giving up any truly important prospects to do it.
Locally owned and operated microbrewery takes flight on Black Friday
So Yi Gak’s team’s product is a hit and all is well in his world so Se Na suggests that they celebrate by going to pick out their engagement rings. But since he’s not really into her, he tells her to get them on her own. Ouch. Then just to make her day even worse, she overhears him telling Chi San to deliver an envelope to Park Ha so she uses her feminine wiles to intercept him and replace the contents. Basically, Yi Gak had spent the morning picking out an apartment for Park Ha while Se Na had a plane ticket to New York with Park Ha’s name on it that Tae Mu had given her.
What else is out there?
The story of the olive branch always made me think that God was bringing peace to Noah. After all, the image of the dove with the olive branch has become an international symbol for peace. In truth, that meaning seems to have more basis in Greek mythology than in the Bible. The olive tree does, however, have great significance to the ancient world and is not used in this story indiscriminately. Why an olive branch? Like
Without any kind of guide or map, this would be quite a daunting journey, since there are currently 99 releases by The Fall to encounter when you include various compilations, studio and live CDs. The Fall are a rock band that were formed in Manchester, England, in 1976, and since their inception have consisted of songwriter/vocalist Mark E. Smith (who is from nearby Salford, an important distinction) and whoever else he lets play and drink with him. While the band’s sound does change significantly at times through the years with these shifting line-ups of musicians, here is a brief quote from Mr. Smith to clarify his position as the central cog in this revolving-door aspect of group membership. “If it’s me and your granny on bongos, it’s a Fall gig.” A small cottage industry on books about Mark Smith and The Fall has developed in the last few years, but none of them specifically tells you what stops are crucial for a successful musical pilgrimage—and what areas you can bypass. I will break down possible itineraries into two categories: essential sites and interesting side trips, with a disclaimer for places to avoid.
On the self-publicity front I was amused by a Sydney Morning Herald piece last week on personalised number plates. Apparently the Victorian police are auctioning off a number of vanity plates that have come into their hands through fair means or foul – though in reality we’re probably talking foul here. HITM4N (HITMAN) and D3AL3R (DEALER) and SO RICH were ones that caught my eye – it did make me wonder about the mentality of those who want to drive around either advertising their dodgy profession, surely bizarre if it happens to be illegal, or giving them the benefit of the doubt, revealing their aspirations (also dodgy).
4. “At a Shelter (After Katrina)”: a short 8-page glimplse into his experience with Katrina. He’s waiting in line for gas in a an extremely long line of cars: maybe, JJS thinks, this is what the apocalypse will look like… A small, powerful essay.
Please visit the new Vintage Weekly meme, which is picking up where Sunday Scans left off. I'll certainly be a regular participant there!
In this way, and by no other means, our governments are given that special kind of “secular democratic sanctity” that endows modern governments and states with moral authority.
Still, while incarcerating the marinating meat in an all but lockable Tupperware, prior to returning it to its isolation wing in the fridge, I have taken to developing this insane anxiety that I might just lick the raw meat, or smear it on my face. Do something wildly inappropriate just to make flesh the fear. I can see how madness develops.
*****to be continued (again) lol.
Width: Width of Die x 2 (front plus back) + 1/4" (fold-over tab)
this assignment into a gig poster.
A friend of mine just commented on how springy some of our new scents are. I realised that I hadn’t posted a picture of Honeydew Melon so here it is! It’s quickly becoming a new favourite.
Anyway, the sun’s been shining for a few days now, and so I’m going to have to ask Mr Young to get the boxes down from the top of my wardrobe so I can take out all the little creased bundles and stuff in all my winter clothes instead.
Here's the extremely simple recipe
(b) Evaluate the Fourier transform of a trapezoidal function f(t) shown in fig. 1.
I baked a big batch of buns this year, and by chance my daughters were visting home this week! I sent most of the buns home with my older daughter to share with her Easter weekend guests.
Does she have enough food for lunch? Will I be able to afford all the school trips they take.
Jermaine Dupri will be at Tryst
But then a week later, after United blew 3 points at Wigan, his City men smashing Norwich for 6, and the points deficit reduced to 2, he is asked again if he thinks the title race has any legs? Oddly, this time he plays it down, pulls a massive U-turn and says that United are too good a team and the title race is definitely over now. Very strange behaviour from the Italian. Or is it?
Well, you're right, you might run into someone you know. But if you're in a different city, who are you going to run into? Or, if you're in your own, do you realize that you probably look a lot different en femme than you do en homme*? I know I do, and I've had people I know walk past me multiple times and not even recognize me.
What Mercedes have in place of a conventional anti roll bar and heave spring are hydraulics units (yellow), which probably also act as the dampers. These are connected via fluid lines (blue) to the central valve block and reservoir (red). Springing for the rear wheels is managed by the torsion bars. One end of which is conventionally located within the rocker pivot, the torsion bar then leading forward and connecting to the front of the gear case.
Stuck at home like Penelope, I was extremely envious, of course. (I finally got the envy out of my system a few years ago learning to sail a reconstructed Viking age ship on a Danish fjord.) But there were no women on the voyage and in any case I obviously didn't have the Olympic-style muscles required for the job. So I whiled away some of the time by thinking up adventurous things I could do on my own, such as going up in a glider - I know - feeble by comparison - and some of the time composing and illustrating my own spoof Mystical Voyage, 'Jason and the AgonyAunts: a silly tale in eight fits', which I gave David when he got back and which I'm going to post on this blog over the next few weeks, beginning on November 25. (For the benefit of American readers, an 'Agony Aunt' is the cheery British term for an advice columnist in a magazine or newspaper.) It's just a bit of fun, but I enjoyed making it and I hope you'll enjoy reading it.
Finished objects have been noticable by their absence here in recent months. This is because I have been working on a secret project for a special birthday present. You may recall the strip of Celtic knotwork from Alice Starmore's St Brigid, which appeared some time ago here.
I plan for wiggle room when possible, either in shelving or my pant size. Hah.
With its distinctive logo and unique packaging, Impulse stood out in the crowd. But it was the music that made Impulse impressive. Impulse captured not only such traditionalists as Duke Ellington and Art Blakey but also cataloged many of the fiery voices of the emerging free-jazz movement, notably led and inspired by John Coltrane, who made his most memorable music for Impulse.
Isn't there at times you just wish you could grab your hands on the items you desire? Be it a great dress, or chic table ware, baking utensils to cook books? Or even a place you would like to visit perhaps; to experience all the culinary culture and adventure?
No wonder that a George Soros front, Citizens for Responsibility and Ethics in Washington, has just petitioned to have the Fox broadcast license revoked. A writer for that racist/fascist extreme right-wing broadcaster had rung the alarm bell on a planned souk where hundreds of participating governments, NGOs, corporations andECOSOC — a curious rhyme with Ingsoc — along with thousands of participants will be haggling over the soon-to-be carcass of the West.
Secondly, there have been concerns about possible damage to showers due to any flow restriction devices.
Let’s get right to it. Here are some of the things I believe in right now…
(J. Ryan Rosser is a Professional Storyteller and Children’s Pastor in Kansas City, MO.)
Samsung Galaxy Tab 2 10.1 official pictures
The PC muscles can be exercised at almost any time—while lying down, sitting (in the car at a stop light, at work, etc.), squatting, standing, or walking— and varying the exercise position is said to be most effective. Sitting or standing adds weight to the exercise.
O helpless-me; atrophied on the planks of rigidity
is not of the concern for massive panic in our general public,
And Grady proved that he really does have a hard head ... especially when he bonks it with another kid in his class. Hello bruise!
I, for one, did not work hard enough in school. I thought for sure that I would skate by on my charm and sense of humor later in life. That has only about half worked out. I want you to have it easier. But, that means working harder – when it counts – in the beginning.
Fulford will not be charged for terminating a clone, since there is no law that addresses te matter, and whether or not clones are considered human beings since they do not contain souls.
“Especially when the Christmas is coming, they need more help.
When a young girl goes missing in Little Hope, a tiny town populated mainly with the elderly, the entire town is effected in various ways. Most notably, Essie, the town's obituary writer. We follow Essie as she, and the rest of the town, become caught up in the kidnapping and the life of the little girl's mother. Questions begin popping up as to whether the kidnapping was completely made up...the ultimate hoax and Essie tries to figure out what it would mean to the town--and to herself-- if the girl was simply a figment of imagination.
When did I turn into THAT mom?
For the beautiful Mass of the priest.
As I read I experienced a conflict never found when reading Wodehouse’s own work. Namely, I was doubly compelled, to write and to read. Partly due, I think, to the infectious quality of Wodehouse’s enthusiasm for his art, and partly due to his biographer’s ability to draw that quality out, I frequently wanted to close the book and go to my own desk to work on my own short stories. It was not Wodehouse’s wild success that drove me, but his obvious love for the writing craft. On the other hand, I was compelled by McCrum’s narrative to continue turning the page. As I was driven away, a greater force kept me in the book.
“What the Israelis were doing wasn’t illegal. However, an illegal demonstration was staged,” a member from the local business community who knows the case well says.
Christy Mathewson, Rube Marquard, or John McGraw (for my 1909 NY Giants collection)
At the end of the panel, the participants were good sports and screamed for the crowd, even in spite of having just said to everyone that you really need to prepare your voice before doing the scream queen thing. By the time they did that, I was already on the way out. I had my VIP pass and was able to sit up front (and without a camera other than the one on my phone), it was time for those who didn’t have one to come up and get photos and stuff.
Ms A herewith releases her own Manifesto for Properly Behaved Theatre Patrons.
These are consistently even burning, and good. I never have to worry about how it is going to burn and what flavors I am going to be surprised by. Always an even oak and leather flavor with just a dash of pepper.
1 annie's
1 lb. frozen long green beans, defrosted
Josh Way is a fan who started doing his own riffing of Public Domain Shorts. I find them super funny. So I will review them.
Prosecutors said Hydorn sold about 1,300 of the do-it-yourself asphyxiation hoods during those years but agreed to stop making or selling them as part of a plea deal.
Everybody wins. Except for maybe the audience.
Scelionid wasps generally live under fallen leaves. These wasps are known to parasitize a great many insect species, and especially their eggs. The scelionid wasp pictured was fossilized while flying, and is no different from present-day specimens.
Every single time you go to the Doctor’s office, it happens.
Marathon runner
Thanks For The Memory - Harry Nilsson (Bob Hope W’38)
Your square will now have 4 triangular flaps, each comprising 2 smaller triangles, coming together at the center of the model.
I drank many bottles of Shiner, like this one. For a random point of reference, one of the friendly Texas bartenders who we kept hopping during our cocktail hours told me that she thought Shiner Bock tasted kind of like Sam Adams. It might, maybe, to some people, but not really to me. Sam Adams is more of a dark lager, while a bock is a style all on it's own. BeerAdvocate is at the ready with a description:
The yellow is FABULOUS. Can I please have patent leather on my dining room chairs? Pretty please? It's practical and ridiculous at the same time. But paired with the muddy beige walls? It just brings down the excitement of the yellow. Reminds me of the worst type of accent walls - where the homeowner is scared to paint all four walls in actual color so they cop out and only do one. Did the designer cop out here? I don't think so - she doesn't look like someon who would cop out on anything
He tried, right?
Enter Hobby Binders!
Watch this short excerpt from a PBS documentary, “The Lord’s Children”:
A little salty your white
1,000,000 players minus 500,000 players in blow outs = 500,000
More thoughts on Amy's choice: I'm not sure, but I don't think I saw a crack this week... Did anyone else? Maybe because in the Dream Worlds/ The TARDIS there's no danger to the fabric of reality. Another thing - I heard someone bring up the fact that Series Five seems very Mouth centric (i.e. the immense teeth on Prisoner Zero; the Doctor and Amy being propelled onto the Starwhale's tongue; the frightening leers of the Smilers; the vampire girls sucking blood...) and now eyes popping out of mouths.
The missionaries’ qualities reflected the source of their recruitment (Christian institutions). Although the overt theme may have been to convert to Christianity underlying this, and reflected by the establishment of thousands of schools, the aim was far broader. It was spoken aloud that the missionaries wanted to “civilise savages”. Read another way, they planned to replicate their own society.
extraordinary experience from a false one. The Lord responded that
We were seated in a booth on one side of the dining room. The large bar was a focal point in the center of the room, with seating around the perimeter. Each booth had small pillows, so that one could adjust the distance from the table and have a comfortable back rest.
But I sat down one day, set my alarm for 20 minutes and raced through it. New email, new password and new link to a new bank account. Linked to Ebay and Etsy. Badabing badaboom! Done, bitches. And I had three minutes to spare. After that, I was a selling machine and inching my way closer to pulling out of the daily grind.
It was a hell of a breakfast: Two bacon, two sausages, two eggs, beans, grilled tomatoes, black pudding, mushrooms, a fried slice and a mug of tea, coffee or grapefruit juice all included in the price of my penthouse suite at the B&B.
These videos definitely put drizzly days into an appealing light. Drizzly days that involve walking around the Jinhua architecture park in China from under the protection of a nice cosy mac, and atop huge geometric paving slabs, naturally.
I will give an example – Black and White TV, Colour TV, High Definition Analogue, Standard Definition Digital, High Definition Digital, 3DTV…Ultra High Definition TV, Super Ultra High Definition TV … Hologram TV…TV Everywhere…For the same mass eyeballs that watch TV between the limited hours of 6-midnight. Terrestrial, Cable, Satellite, IPTV, WebTV, OTT, TV Everywhere…on all devices…even the Fridge gets a mention…
As usual, i sneaked in a few shots of my wife in the stunners to give you a sneak peak of what to expect there.
In Memory's mystic band,
In fact, this is not the first time we've heard such an announcement and I give it less cred than the initiative from Planetary Resources, by some distance. Still, the coincidence in timing... plus a number of fascinating technologies that I saw while attending (as an advisor) the recent NASA Innovative and Advanced Concepts workshop ... lead me to wonder. Is our time of disappointment in space coming to an end?
Seconds tick by...
Writers--save your money. If you want to use a display site, you'll get the most benefit if you choose one that includes a writers' community and is sponsored by a group you recognize--and that doesn't make you pay to participate.
So easily
6-8 weeks wait for CGH results!
It hurt so badly to read that. Why does there have to be a comparison? My gut wanted to immediately post all the reasons I feel differently, that maybe I feel adoption is better than other options (it obviously is for me, or I wouldn't be making the choice). How dare they suppose that I will not be as close to my adopted child as anyone else is to their child?
While I was sitting amongst some of my very favorite local blogging women - a powerhouse room to be sure- I was thilled and fascinated at the study they had done about rasing 'good' kids. Good Kids. I want Max to be a good kid. We were provided with the top ten key findings for parenting skills for raising good kids, philanthropic kids.
Jessica Simpson FINALLY had a baby after being pregnant for what seems like a million years. But don’t think you’d be able to tell the gender by the name; Jess and fiance Eric Johnson welcomed baby girl Maxwell Drew Johnson. Reports surfaced a while ago that this would be the name and that she’d go by “Maxi” for short, which is a little bit cute, but I expected that she’d at least have a feminine middle name. But it’s by no means the worst baby name in Hollywood. Jess made the announcement on her website, sharing that little Maxi weighed a whopping 9lb 13oz, but honestly, with how big Jess got, I’m surprised she wasn’t a bigger baby. Congratulations to the new parents.
And each time I go to Erin's, I get so excited to see that she is so similar to myself, giving everything it's proper home, keeping notes of her schedules and meals and giving items new purposes for the sake of keeping her life running organized and smoothly.
“I’m surprised you haven’t chosen to pick on the parting of the red sea or on Noah’s ark or any of those events.” I have tackled these issues before, and it gets boring, but are you trying to say that you maybe even don’t believe these things happened? They didn’t, rest assured. If there were a worldwide flood, somewhere in the geological strata there would be proof of it, but there isn’t. If the Red Sea was parted, then there would be proof of thousands of Egyptian soldiers and their horses and chariots washed away in it. Nothing has been found in the Red Sea except something that may or may not be a chariot wheel. Oh, that’s proof of it right there. One object that slightly resembles a wheel is proof that Moses parted the Red Sea, therefore proving God! That’s the ace in the hole for people who try and prove the events of the Exodus.
This has happened before.
Her op-ed begins: The recession, the credit crunch and the inherent difficulty of building in the most densely settled city in America: These are just a few of the challenges that have dogged the Atlantic Yards project since its announcement, in December 2003.
Racked: 01-17-2009
35. Whiskey Bent and Hell Bound -- Hank Williams Jr.
3 Brewers is a brewpub with probably the best location on the planet for a brewpub. Right on Yonge street smackdab in the thick of things. This place was packed, but I was able to get a table with big open patios to the street. Lots of dark red and whatnot, and a pretty nice placemat that goes over the process for brewing beer. Very nicely done. Doesn't hurt that they have Glam Rock on the TV. Looking forward to trying their beers along with some fries.
I have had that experience very rarely. At the Holiday Ale Fest, even before I tasted Ninkasi Believer, I suspected I had found another. The aroma was so exceptional that I didn't even try a sip before I handed my mug around for people to smell. To a person, they all had the same surprised look, and they all went back for a follow-up sniff. The flavor was no disappointment--like BridgePort's IPA, it was sunny and delightful, equally appealling to a beer geek or a novice. I have no idea whether Ninkasi will continue to brew this beer, but I hope they do. It could become an Oregon standard.
The shake had plenty of brownie chunks both in the shake itself and piled high atop the whipped cream.
Which reminds me, the people who usually sit on the sides of the street with open wounds are causing havoc to my heart every time I see them. I gasp every time and close my eyes. I mean the wounds are open. I don’t mean to sound like I got a stick up my ass but there has to be a law they are breaking. You do realize that exposing open wounds to the elements like that can make a housefly spread disease, I just shuddered….
Jaela - we get mad easy
The meat of the convention, as normal, happened at the bar and the late night parties. I met Adrian Tchaikovsky (author of the highly enjoyable Shadows of the Apt series) for the first time (he's halfway through writing the tenth and final book in the series) and caught up with a whole raft of other contacts. No massive exclusives, although Joe Abercrombie is heavily into the edits on A Red Country and confirmed that it looks like the UK edition will keep the 'A' in the title whilst the US edition will drop it (as seen on the already-revealed cover art). Gollancz also announced that they are bringing the Wild Cards series to the UK, with the original three books to be published before the end of the 2012 and then the 'new generation' books starting with Inside Straight to follow next year. A plan for the 'middle books' (including the long-missing iBook volumes) hasn't yet been decided upon, aside from the possibility of releasing them as ebook-only editions. Elsewhere, Chris Wooding confirmed he was just about to start working on the fourth Ketty Jay book as well.
Weaknesses
Records — Ursuline 4-0; Byram Hills 5-1.
30. Boys couldn’t care less about Barby.
The questions ricocheted off the marble walls,
and Czech glass
"I wonder if I was created for such a glorious future?" The fir tree rejoiced. "Why, that is better than to cross the sea. I'm tormented with longing. Oh, if Christmas would only come! I'm just as tall and grown-up as the trees they chose last year. How I wish I were already in the cart, on my way to the warm room where there's so much splendor and glory. Then-then something even better, something still more important is bound to happen, or why should they deck me so fine? Yes, there must be something still grander! But what? Oh, how I long: I don't know what's the matter with me."
I tried once to figure out what grog tasted like, a mix of water and rum served on sailing ships, but I didn't like it. I probably watered it down too much. Hughes explains that "Norfolk dumplings" are 100 lashes and the "Newgate Hornpipe" is a rather visceral description of how those hanged at the infamous Newgate Prison would kick their heels and twitch as they died.
Classic Bride constantly features all sorts of different services and products associated with the wedding world including but not limited to photography, paper goods, favors, floral design, gifts, artwork, books, venues, fashion and jewelry. If you have a product or service that you believe fits within CB's style and you would like a sponsored post or giveaway highlighting that product/service, send me an e-mail with details and I'll provide you current rates. Posts include up to 5 images, proper text links, editorial by myself and posts are marked as Sponsored Posts in order to comply with FTC regulations. The post can act as an introduction to a product or service and may contain discounts and/or giveaways.
Soft-Boiled Eggs
vegetable or corn oil
Cheesecloth for straining / draining - You can use a linen towel or old t-shirt (I like to use old t-shirts when I don't want my favorite linen towels stained - think Black Raspberry jelly.)
The media and pr internship would take place at one of two offices-either SpotLightSeattle or Realogics Sotheby’s and will focus on, among other things, writing, strategy, social media and media outreach. There would also likely be some administrative components. The internships would be unpaid and for school credit, and can be flexible in terms of time of year, scheduling and length of internship.
Consume and be consumed
She says, ‘I am content when wakened birds,
We are free to speak, we are free to worship. We don't realize the great honor that is ours. But our freedom came at a cost. Many died defending this great land. We have gone outward and defended other nations who cannot stand up against the evil that pushes against them, as well. We are defenders of freedom. We are known for it, even criticized. But we are free.
So seriously in Lagos, ‘”The Way You Are Dressed, Could Kill You.’”
12.) What kind of work do you NOT represent?
And there would be no money exchanged because it's utopia. And in utopia you get all the Rachel Comey boots you want, in the big sizes that are usually sold out, and you get to ride around on a dog sled like a Siberian queen. Those dogs take you right to the flower market where you get more stuff to make more arrangements.
I am truly overwhelmed with the outpouring of love and prayers for Katie and our family during this difficult time. More than ever before, this Mother's Day I am filled with an appreciation for the amazing gift of my children. God is good at all times. In spite of everything I see God's hand of protection over this situation. With all my heart I am standing on James 5:16. I know she will be healed because the effective prayer of the righteous accomplishes much. Thanks for the prayers and support of this ministry. Daphne
The road was duly opened and became known as the ‘Coffee Road’ from the fact that Gen. John Coffee of Telfair County, one of the Commissioners, had charge of its opening. It ran through the present counties of Berrien and Cook into Brooks and thence into present Thomas. It afforded the main highway of travel for some years down into Lowndes and Thomas and Decatur Counties and into West Florida.
14 Dark Globe 2:58 July 27, 1969 Choral Version - Peter Jenner 1987 Echo Mix
So I just said no to a big project.
But just remember: If you really want to make it as a writer KEEP WRITING.
When I began playing Bastion the other day, I also started a little experiment – I started to keep a video game diary. Whether it was a snippet of the narrator’s dialogue or simply what happened when Kid, the main character, performed various actions, I wrote it all down. While my main purpose was primarily to record the events of the story for a future article, I actually ended up discovering that noting down my experiences made playing the game a lot more meaningful. It made me much more aware of the game’s thematic nuances, and it made me think more carefully about my choices and actions, so I wanted to share a few of my findings.
So, I gave in. ”You can do it,” I cheered. “Go. Go. Go.” And he produced a symphony of successful sounds just for me, no one else. And we went home gas free.
Be a slave to fashion. You don't need to be an elitist you make sure you are wearing what other people are wearing. Its easier to blend in and avoid unnecessary tension when you can rattle things from within.
“I’ll stay. I want to stay.” He hadn’t been asleep for longer than twenty minutes but it had helped take the edge off.
Here are some great links to more on dialogue tags:
208The world forgetting, by the world forgot.
on the table, took a seat, and asked, “Do you follow any local artists?”
For this card I used the Animal Kingdom Cricut Cartridge. And of course a Peachy Keen Face Stamp. The sentiment is from My Pink Stamper.
Just because smiling melts hearts.
Today a small flotilla of boats, two coxed quads, a double and a single, set out from Blouberg to Robben Island and back, for a grand outing in support of the Anchors Away Village, a home for the intellectually challenged in Noordhoek. Participants came from Alfreds Rowing Club, UCT and Simonstown.
Have you ever considered, what do I really want?
We've already had some really great requests and we'll be deciding soon what events we'll be participating in!
Their grief remains unresolved and life… it goes on .
“Musetta’s Waltz” from La Bohem
I'll still be here, churning out delicious things in my kitchen and forcing them on loved ones, while posting recipes to my food blog. Teaching and cooking for people are a part of me that will never change. And I'll still be here, if you decide to bring home that bag of dipping chocolate and then wonder what the heck to do with it. Ask me whatever you want, and I'll post every single one of my tips.
It is common for trade mark attorneys, whose clients have had their trade mark applications rejected, to advise their clients to wait until there has been a material change of circumstances and then to file a fresh application. The question arises as to what happens when the first application is not abandoned until the Board of Appeal level within OHIM and the second refiled application goes to the General Court. How should the General Court approach the second application? Should it ignore what has gone before or is it bound by the earlier OHIM Board of Appeal decision?
The 4th and final time I woke up with another full bladder I seen myself popping thru what looked like a black sheet of rubber. It was in the high upper atmosphere of Life (somehow I just knew that when I seen my head literally pop thru this veil) and I knew… I made it thru!
So: take one premade cover, one insert and voila!
Here, narrated by Cornelius Colomb, is the story Wolverine, Wolf, and Fire Medicine:
Tess at Life at Willow Manor began a series of
3) Begin holiday shopping. That takes money so it may not happen until December.
But you know what? The number one question my children and I hear when out and about during daytime hours is, "You have a break from school?" And every time we get that question, in some form or another, these murky waters of JUSTIFY YOUR LIFE get stirred up.
Jack: But you just said it to ME!!!!
Grease – “Conventionality belongs to yesterday.” G=TW (where G=”grease” and TW=”the word”). Pauper Players presents the 1971 musical. This week: Friday and Saturday 8:00. Sunday 2:30 and 8:00. Monday 8:00. Continues through Tuesday April 17. The ArtsCenter, Carrboro.
EABA is published by Blacksburg Tactical Research Center which is Greg Porter. EABA's creation starts out with a game called TimeLords (not related to Doctor Who), A dirivitave of the TimeLords game system was used to power a game called CORPS, which was a conspiracy theory game. Many of the elements and lessons learned from making CORPS went into the making of EABA.
Playlist:
Today marks the first day of Hanukkah, and tomorrow the first day of Winter, and then, on Saturday, there is Christmas Eve and in the morning, Christmas Day, and right on its heels, Kwanzaa. For weeks now, we have been offering up our vague but heartfelt holiday wishes longing, in this final month of the calendar year, to be festive without offending. For many I’m sure, chirping “Happy Holidays” feels just right, but for me it’s come to sound a bit shallow, a shopping bag wish, and in some ways, a sell-out of my own faith. Still, I’m no fan of the alternative suggested strongly in certain Christian circles: shouting “Merry Christmas” to anyone and everyone in the hopes of regaining supremacy over the season. It doesn’t matter that Christmas was “the first” holiday of the season, or that the others were elevated to a status beyond their own cultural or religious importance just to get a seat at the holiday table. As a professional communicator I can tell you that using “Merry Christmas” as your default greeting is simply the wrong message. A greeting is a gift to the recipient. To wish a Jewish or agnostic friend a “Merry Christmas” is just bad manners, possibly even antagonistic—- like greeting a devout Angels fan with “Go Blue!” It does not make one a better Christian, just a less thoughtful member of a pluralistic society.
Little wonder then that heraldry was adopted so willingly in a mostly illiterate society that loved colour and display. It spread throughout Europe like a new religion, its priests were the wandering Herald/Minstrels and its plain chant was blazon. Kings, nobles, clergy and merchants all became willing disciples and the adoption of hereditary devices became an affirmation of personal confidence and status.
Further you teach about the elevated position of the spiritual master:
In our country, we have always allowed the leaders to enforce their ideas on our minds. We get intimidated by them very easily. The fear of losing something precious has made our country devoid of all the happiness. The leaders have been fighting wars and battles for POWER in which, the common man has always been positioned just as the scapegoat. And this is because he never retaliated, never fought back. His eyes were always closed shut. Either by death, or by the shine of money. Its time, we open his eyes, as well as our own. It’s time to retaliate. It’s time to battle our way to peace. And its time to do something worthwhile.
The second the costs outweigh the benefits corporations will stop being created. Now I’m sure some very stupid socialists out there are cheering at that idea…the rest of us have at least a vague idea of why that is a very, very bad thing. Without the protections of a corporation, innovation/starup businesses & investment will stop; when investment stops growth and economic prosperity will stop; from there innovation will halt and our standard of living will collapse. Look at it this way, China which still doesn’t have much in the way of private property rights (which are a key point to true and long lasting economic growth) has protection for corporations and investment. Most of China’s recent growth in the last couple of decades has been because of these legal protections allowing corporations to grow and prosper. If we completely get rid of those protections expect to be living in a very nice third-world nation. (Oh and you 99% idiots, think income inequality is bad now…just wait for a civilization where there is no growth).
Kos glanced over his shoulder at the hall; she could almost see the shiver run through him as he remembered what he'd been placed to watch. Barrit showed no such unease, crossing in a few brisk steps to the door and looking inside. "Still there." He turned back, a hint of reproach in his eyes. "I did check when Hullen appeared, but if they were going to filch the Rods, they'd have done it when we were at our most distracted, I'm sure."
Cape Town - Suspended Tshwane deputy metro police chief Ndumiso Jaca has been charged, the national prosecuting authority (NPA) said on Friday, according to a report.
Homemade Vegetable Beef Soup
So here are my choices
Morris and his wife, Esther, went to the State Fair every year, and every year Morris would say, "Esther, I's like to ride in that helicopter."
Robert Reich (former Secretary of Labor and now Professor at U.C. Berkeley) published this piece on The Decline of the Public Good. It's worth a read. Actually, it's worth much more than a read. Philanthropists should read it and wonder "where do we fit into this?"
I have this as part of one of 2008's holiday palette (smokey one I believe). I think I will have to purchase the pro-pan form of this, for easier travels. This is a staple -- Vanilla (pigment) on the lids and Satin Taupe in the crease and you have your day look. Add some black or dark brown to the outer V and you're ready for a night out.
Andy Stanley rightly points out that we are still sinners and miserable sinners after conversion. He fails, however, to distinguish between election and reprobation due to his blatant Arminianism--except for the one point of Calvinism of the perseverance of the saints. But if Albert Mohler is correct that Andy Stanley is deliberately downplaying homosexuality as a sin while condemning adultery then it is a natural inference to conclude that megachurches are moving toward minimizing homosexuality and fornication as sinful behavior and incompatible with true conversion. The 39 Articles of Religion expresses the view of Calvin, Luther and Cranmer on this issue:
Hello Everyone!!! I'm Kathy and I'm thrilled to be part of the team bringing you the brand new CopicOz blog!!! We're also excited to say that the new Spica Colours are coming to Australia!! Woohoo!!! The really cool thing about these colours is that they are designed to be matches for your Copic Markers ---
But iknew it was wrong…
“Yea, and with much crinkling of the brow, they doth wait for their answer in large illuminations from above, a shining light; thine almighty finger in the sky, leads them out,” (John 10:4 ISV – Iain Sutherland Version). Once (early 2011), when I was stranded in a Twizel, I was listening so hard to God that a street address, a house colour, and a persons name popped into my head. I could feel it! I would spend the night at this mystery person’s house! Excited, and dreaming of my name being added to Christian hall of faith (Hebrews 11), I drove to the address. After driving around the block three times I discovered, it simply didn’t exist! My mind had created what I desperately desired, answers.
Optus prevailed at trial, with Rares J finding the recordings were made by the users of TV Now, not by Optus.
To test for soft ball stage: one drop of syrup into very cold water and it should form a nice soft ball. Once it's reached soft ball stage, slowly add in the other 3/4 C. of the cream/milk mixture stirring continually. Cook until consistency is closer to hard ball but not hard ball stage. I test by putting a teaspoonful onto the cookie sheet and if it stays together and after a minute or two, you can mold it slightly with your fings and it stays then it is ready. Also the color should be a medium carmel color.
Since he works for DirecTV we were able to watch it from their VIP area right next to the blue team.
Notes taken by: Juan Fajardo
I am happily making my chocolate batter, mixing melted butter and chocolate, attempting to not eat the packet of choc chips and fiercely keeping a spoon away from the batter.
Waist = Equator
I decided to use my Christmas money to buy the new Strawberry Kisses collection from Crafters Companion and have had so much fun with it this afternoon…..my crafting mojo wasn’t there so I am not too happy with my cards but I loved playing with the cute little characters!
Drawing on a decade of submissions to the zine, Lady Churchill’s Rosebud Wristlet , the variety of stories in their newly published “Best Of” anthology hold only one clear message: here there be monsters! Whether it involves mushroom-crazed duchesses, unavoidable ghosts, talking animals, or only a sorry inability to mix a great cocktail, the imaginable atrocities of life, and some that only these authors could have imagined, find vibrant and stirring representations in this book.
3c) Send the Army Corp of Engineers in to rebuild the levees AND reclaim the wetlands; they get to set the parameters after sending a contingency to The Netherlands to look at how people actually build dikes & seawalls that work. Houses and businesses in the former wetlands will have to be eliminated. (This is when eminent domain is not only acceptable but necessary.) That will upset both environmentalists and industrialists. Too bad.
"Mo twickatweet!" he insisted again and again.
When your camera focus on the target have you ever wondered how it works?
The cops know where the problems are, be they completely pissed people, or the pubs that serve them when they are pissed (small minorities in both cases) and they should get on with sorting them out and leave the rest of us alone.
You don't need a lot of seasoning for the fish, just the RIGHT seasoning. Some sea salt, fresh ground black pepper, garlic and lemon, and you're ready to start grilling. Get your grill going strong at roughly a medium flame, then oil up your grill and place your skewers down. I would say4-5 minutes per side and your done, unless you want it a little charred then go maybe 1-2 more minutes per side. Basting it with some melted butter while its still on the grill is an excellent way to do this "charring" as well. Be cautious and remember this fish cooks fast, and with the butter the flames will get hotter. Don't overcook it, or it will get dry and not taste so good. Flavor is what you're after!
Anyway, I know how much I enjoy getting hand written letters in the mail from friends and family
Or maybe you haven’t even gotten around to asking those questions yet. Maybe you’re afraid of what the answer will be or you’re afraid to admit that your trust in God isn’t at 100%. You want to know what I think? Admitting to God your doubts and worries, and asking him those raw questions that eat you up inside, is far better than pretending to understand. Quite frankly, it’s impossible to fully understand how God works. The sooner we realize that, the easier it’ll be for us to be completely honest with God and with ourselves.
7.) “Time Travellin”
Another reason is that I’ve often found myself in the position where I have vastly different experiences than the people I’m surrounded by and therefore, we have a hard time relating to each other.
Today's publicly traded behemoths are lead by lawyers, accountants and MBAs who could no more recognize a good ad than replace a carburetor. If their agencies never had to make another ad -- if they could just be consultants and branding bullshitters -- they'd be perfectly happy.
So the rice showed some promise, but the oat was not good. Maybe BT should give potatoes a try.
They’ve traveled the world and Andrea is considering signing them up for air miles.
Badly needs a trade and snatch a steady point guard (ehem Jonas Villanueva) as Jazul, Hubalde and Duncil were all off-guards.
Gibby has pics of food on his Pear Pad…
Somehow I forgot to send this one:
I thought they sounded delicious and made them for dinner to have with some filet steak
pull my fingernails out one by one...
So much to organise, but the salient points (or those that Rebecca & I were struck by) were that small children & other siblings should not be allowed to be disruptive, if they could possibly be left somewhere else/locked in a small windlowless room then all the better AND would parents please not talk amongst themselves while the children were singing, if we could request those caught chattering to shut up then that would be a good thing...
Jack: (warily eyeing me from the back seat) You know, I promised SWEAR TO GOD that I wouldn’t tell anyone, so…
Hassan, himself, only saw two foreigners, tourists most likely, when they “emerged into the open space of the Jemaa from the direction of the Rue Derb Dabachi,” but the one thing that is clearest in his mind was the woman’s beauty:
“Whoa, hold on there lady. I’ll thank you not to shove food in my mouth before I’m able to inspect it.”
Love Shack – Darren Criss arrives in the last few minutes to sing something and showcase Ryan Murphy’s obsession with him
He saw the engineer still up working. The engineer was surprised to see Shankar, but before he could say anything, Shankar said: Sahib, lion.
Published with Blogger-droid v1.6.9
Just some "deconstructed" Thanksgivingish things I looked at on the web for inspiration to serve with the green-chile stuffing that I'm definately going to make. Thought it would be fun to do one deconstructed dish but haven't decided on anything in particular yet. I guess soup is easiest.
The Italian guy who might as well go around the whole movie going “Thatsa bigga pizza pie!”, or Kathy Bates as Molly Brown, the most broadly painted character in history. Or the aforementioned Billy Zane, who may as well have been wearing a Snidely Whiplash mustache he was so fucking evil. There’s no grey area with any of the characters. The Italian guy is merely Italian. Molly Brown is a damned quote machine. Billy Zane is only missing the railroad tracks and rope.
It's time to announce the winners of our Love Challenge!
And, for Jacob’s tushy at least, they honestly work better (and are a lot cheaper!) than the commercial diaper rash creams. And I tried them all.
Now before I show you the final result, I need to recover the seat cushion. I'm loving all things ikat right now, due in no small part to all the irresistible eye candy Louise has gathered over at Table Tonic. So many lovelies to choose from, and by sticking with white I can change the cushions whenever I like for a whole new look. Take a peek:
10 Son Of The South 04:49
The use of a second and different router was necessary due to intricate settings for the VOIP known as Teamspeak. Recently, a power surge destroyed a very solid server that has been the home of this great communications platform. After much girlyman crying and whining the service has returned. It was all good then the router started to slowly die. At the end I was restarting it every 10 minutes or so. This is a 24/7 service and is physically hosted in our computer lab by the new and improved server. Restarting a router every few minutes is not an option.
The highlights of the new agreement mark a significant increase in flight frequency between Vietnam and the UK. Transport officials of two countries have agreed to bring the number of weekly services between the two countries to 14 from only three flights a week in their first aviation agreement clinched in 1994 and revised in 1999.
“The amazing thing was indeed that Mercier Press immediately agreed and wanted to go ahead when Chrissy contacted them to talk about her project, even though she was not a historian, had never written a book and wasn’t even a journalist.
Think about ALL of creation. Before God called it to be it didn’t exist. This is the Creator of EVERYTHING, the One who called it into existence! What can he not deliver if He himself has promised it?! Do I believe this when I think about receiving his promises?! Sometimes I think we think we believe things on the surface, but we forget to believe down deep in our souls what it means to REALLY believe what God is absolutely CAPABLE of because of WHO he is.
2. Write a plot “skeleton”. I’m not sure of how else to describe this. I am writing, sort of a time line, that includes all the events that are going to occur in this story. Plot line? Order of Events? I don’t know what to call this. But I have done this.
Chippendale pattern on cabinets….love (Just told Jon earlier this week I wanted to do something similar to this and now voila a great picture to show him what I meant.)
9. Favorite day of the week? Friday!
That’s neither here nor there. Want to know the outstupided move of them all?
Perjury cases are far rarer, in part because they cannot be dealt with in the same summary way as prevarication.
... looked over Tyler's work schedule for May.
Don't count on the deterrent working. The bad guy wasn't deterred by the door of an inhabited house, they might not be deterred by other things, too.
To be in with a chance of winning the prize this week you will need to upload your card using inlinkz.com by 8pm GMT on Wednesday 22nd February 2012.
I have blessed My children with intelligence and an independent free will where they can choose whatever way they decide to live their lives.
Ouedraogo Mamadou: voice
We weren‘t able to get a copy of the video or even a snapshot of my stomach. But at least there is no ulcer at the moment. Biopsy analysis of the stomach tissue will b released next week. If there are indications of h. pylori infection, we‘ll be eradicating them with prescribed antibiotics.
"The Canadian government?!?"
Finally, let’s talk about the dark horses. Tonight, I actually have two. The first is “Mr. I can’t believe how badly this season has started” Khane, also known as Kasey Khane. He had a great finish last week and he performs well at Richmond. He keeps himself out of trouble and his team does it’s job, Kasey could very well be the sleeper and get the victory tonight.
Bottom Line
Mostly it’s tough to do nothing
But the main point he makes is how today's Conservative party is failing to champion capitalism. Nothing illustrates this more than the backtracking on the NHS reforms we're seeing now. Many will put this down to the influence of the Lib Dems but the truth is that it is also a symptom of the Tories desire not to re-contaminate their brand. The simplistic messages put about by socialists is far easier to get across in soundbites on the telly and in newspaper headlines than some theory associated with free markets. Free markets that many people associate with selfish pursuit of profit by "fat cats".
Does anyone else find these things disturbing?
WIP = Wearing It Proudly!: Whether it is yourself, a friend or family member, a charity recipient, a bed or couch or teapot or a yarn-bombed maple tree, I hope your work will be appreciated and Worn In Pride. One final note however ... DO NOT ALLOW THE WEARER OR THE FO TO MOVE. FELTING WILL OCCUR.
I really REALLY like the phrase dinosaur rocker. You'll earn extra eyeball time on a query with phrases like that. It gives me hope.
5. Any State whose Government debt exceeds 60% will reduce the debt level by 1/20th of the level above 60% per year.
Alessandro Capotto - saxophones, clarinets, flute
To participate, consumers can go to The Home Depot or The Home Depot Foundation’s Facebook page, and choose how many of the six easy and fun outdoor projects they want to tackle. Once their project is completed, consumers simply upload a photo of their creation and select which organization they would like to receive $100. The Home Depot Foundation will donate up to $25,000 to each of the four nonprofits for projects completed in their honor, and will double the total amount for the organization that receives the most projects.
A Closing Thought
In case you missed it, here’s the video:
1,000,000 quiet moments. Just us two. Rocking together in our chair by the window. Your head now so familiar in the crook of my neck. Your little body so familiar in my arms. Like they were always meant to hold you.
Home for the Holidays ... Lifetime ... 6 PM
Kathy Jones
“The court finds that an immediate form of action is necessary to avoid an act which will threaten the public peace or endanger lives or (cause) riots or fights if this rally proceeds,” said Zaki in the court order made available to The Malaysian Insider.
Peter and the other disciple started out for the tomb. They were both running, but the other disciple outran Peter and reached the tomb first. He stooped and looked in and saw the linen wrappings lying there, but he didn't go in. Then Simon Peter arrived and went inside. He also noticed the linen wrappings lying there, while the cloth that had covered Jesus' head was folded up and lying apart from the other wrappings. Then the disciple who had reached the tomb first also went in, and he saw and believed - for until then they still hadn't understood the Scriptures that said Jesus must rise from the dead.
The best way to blast through the beginning period of ugly stitches is to quilt every single day if you can. Here's a great post on how to find more time to quilt by adjusting your lifestyle slightly.
Kelsey Grammar is probably worst dressed actor in this movie. Oh my!
Q068) The thing you must have in your bag is?
Here are some new favorites I've added lately, starting with my sapphire and iolite bracelet which I just love if I do say so myself!
4. Menomena - Air Aid
I am drowning
I'll be at IRA in Chicago (May), BEA in NYC (June), ALA in Anaheim (June), and Comic-Con in San Diego (July), plus two book tours later in the summer and fall. More details to come, but that's just a heads up. My new website (coming soon!!!) will be up and running in time for those events and it will have a really great calendar system for my appearance schedule.
It seems to me
Once again, there is a point to all this -- but I haven't quite gotten to it yet. I'm saving it for tomorrow, as it strikes me as an appropriate way to mark Independence Day.
Pat’s characters are beautifully realised and depicted, from Will, the main character to Brother Walter, the hob whom Will rescues from a trap, from the mysterious Shadlok and his master, the leper Jacobus, to the monks of Crowfield Abbey. Together with rich characterization, Pat’s ability to evoke wonderful descriptions of the times (the story is set in 1347) brings the story vividly to life and it makes for an “unputdownable read”.
(And stay tuned--I have been working on lots of random projects recently and will show them off when this contest ends--right before I start the St. Patrick's day design festivities!)
We were seated downstairs in a small room off the main area which was highly reminiscent of a castle dungeon. The restaurant has quite a good atmosphere and was packed full when we arrived at 10pm. Later in the night, there was even a guitar quintet (a bunch of local uni students) who came and did a live performance for everyone to enhance the mood.
Spell Bound by Kelley Armstrong - 325 pages
“I will personally fucking eviscerate you, right? …And I mean, I don’t have your education, I don’t know what it means, but I will start by ripping your cock off and I’ll busk it from there, ok…?”
What is THIS GOAL, you ask? It’s the weight requirement goal the WLS surgeon gave me – to be 266 lbs. When he originally gave me this goal, it meant losing 25 lbs. The other major goal that he gave me was to quit smoking. I quit smoking August 11, 2010, and in the process (along with the holidays that quickly followed), I gained 20 lbs.
An ideal setup—except…
2 Tbsp. milk
1 teaspoon fresh lemon juice
Lately I’ve realised I don’t feel I’ve much to say about who I am or what defines me. Yes ok I’m a busy lady, working full time, running gospel choirs, teaching, training and being involved in other activities. Those are the surface things in my life ~ they tell you what I do every day, how I’m committed and involved with people. My actions suggest that I have a heart the size of the ocean and some cannot fathom why I do, all that I do. What makes me who I am?
5. Where would you like to live?
Hurley’s notebook with his rewrite of the “Empire Strikes Back”: $4,250
Took us another 1-2 hours staying there taking photos and walking checking the entire place. Around 5PM we decided to go to the nearest shopping mall so we could rest and have our dinner early because we will have an early flight to Bali the next day.
Denise Minin
We now find that the killing of eight year old Victoria Climbié, from the Ivory Coast in Western Africa, who was tortured to death by her aunt and her aunt's boyfriend in February 2000, a crime long held to be a failing by British social services, in fact involved strong elements of witchcraft. (They certainly kept that information quiet for the last twelve years.)
Brushed aside, by greed, and those kneeling now
Despite the fact that these are merely mild annoyances, I don’t have any other larger annoyances (such as the looming shadow of finals), so these mild ones take precedence.
And when you groan and moan
That’s an apt description of this situation as well.
The same circumstances were experienced in camps such as Brandfort, Springfontein and Orange River. At Pretoria, the Irene Camp was located at the chilly southern side of the town, while the northern side had a much more favourable climate. Balmoral, Middelburg and other camps were also located on the south-eastern hangs of the hills to ensure that the inhabitants were exposed to the icy south easterly winds.
Washable markers (must be washable for the tie-dye look)
The morning after Jesse and Michelle arrived we started the Christmas holiday season with some very sad news...my sister-inlaw Irma had passed away on the 21 Dec.
Hell Train is a horror novel paying tribute to the glory days of Hammer Films. The novel opens in 1966, when Hammer was beginning to lose the momentum from The Curse of Frankenstein and Horror of Dracula, and was looking for a new hit. Screenwriter Shane Carter receives an assignment to write the next Hammer film, but he has only five days to do it. The producer Michael Carreras (an actual Hammer producer) suggests something about a train. As Carter wanders the Hammer studio, his eyes fall on a board game called "Hell Train." In the second chapter, a young girl finds the same game in her attic, but gets more than she bargained for when she begins to play. The third chapter takes us to Europe during World War I, where a British con artist has arrived by train at a mysterious village. We don't know how these scenes connect yet, but one suspects that the girl and/or the con artist are actually characters in the movie Shane Carter is writing.
Relight Rule No. 5: Take the blame — are you both ready to hold your hands up to the part you played in your relationship breaking up? If yes, that's an excellent sign that you realise it's a two-way street when relationships end. Use this new, responsible attitude that you both have to work out how you can do things differently.
I grabbed the handkerchief I had left on the coffee table downstairs from when I was watching a very sad movie. I wanted to rescue the mouse, but I didn't want to expose myself to rabies. One series of rabies shots in the stomach in a lifetime is enough.
*Federal Emergency Management Agency (FEMA)
I encourage you to make art today. Release your creativity, Its all beautiful because it comes from an individual. How do you see the world. Put it in a painting, a short story, a poem, tagging, movie making, You are a beautiful human being. Don't let anyone tell you any different. Those of you who hurt children, and animals, well you can cut yourself open and explore yourself. Have sex with women who look young, but are adults and are willing partners. Rape is not creative. Sometimes two evils do make sense. Such as a young defencless woman is raped by a trusted person ment to have her best intrest in mind, well you are the scum of the earth. Casteration is what we should do with you. Not just casteration, but also cutting of the penis, and giving them a hose hooked up to the existing uruthra and let your bladder evacuate into a bag on your ankle.
Not just because I have blue eyes and am uneasy in situations where I have to make small talk. I do know a lot of blue-eyed people who in one way or other fit this category too.
You can also breakdown the styles to their parts. I wish I had had this book back when I did my posting on two-toned hair through the 20th century.
2 Samuel 1:26 states: “I am distressed over you, my brother Jonathan, very pleasant you were to me. More wonderful was your love to me than the love from women.”
Puylaert Home Basics participates in national and international fairs.
I'll let you know how that goes!
In 1877, Harriet Staunton's husband and three others were accused of starving her to death and lurid newspaper reports of the Penge murder trial held the nation's rapt attention. A bestselling novel about the affair – written in 1934 and now republished – proves as gripping today .
5. Mississippi Half-Step Uptown Toodleloo - 8:48
In the midst of the throw down the chap behind my right shoulder stands up and boy does he looked pissed. Seen this guy before, never caught his name unfortunately, but won’t make that mistake in the future. This gent looks to be arounds about the same age as me which just so happens to be getting younger and younger every year, and though I don’t know beyond a shadow of a doubt, my previously discussed spidey sense tells me this guy is a veteran. I get the strong impression this young man signed up some time ago to defend his country as a patriot and to defend the constitution he swore an oath to protect only to discover once on foreign soil that the wool had been pulled over his eyes and this…this…this is not what he signed up for. Therefore I think we can allow him a little brevity to be a witches boiling brew of pissed in light of the complete and total disregard and dismissive attitude towards his service because he happens to be a Ron Paul supporter while seeking representation at his local mass meeting.
QueryShark is designed to get you to effective. For spectacular, you gotta do it yourself. The most I can help you there is showing query letters that worked for me. There's a list on the blogroll titled "Queries That Got To YES" with ten of them as of today.
I coloured the image with Promarkers and used lots of stickles on her wings.
After a couple of hours, contractions started to happen regularly- about every 3 minutes. They were not intense though- just regular. We walked around my neighborhood a few times to see if we could get them to intensify- but to no avail. They did keep coming though. We started doing pressure points- and immediately after my hubby- his name is Dan- would apply pressure to the inside of my ankle, an intense contraction would follow. So, every time I started to contract he would apply pressure.
Thou art as wise as thou art beautiful.
THE LONG UNDERWEAR HE PULLED OUT FROM THE DIRTY LAUNDRY AN HOUR AGO.
Wednesday – the day in between.
Article 13
By the time The Addams Family premiered on TV, they were all familiar to me, as well known to me as my own family, though far more entertaining. And were brought to life by that amazingly perfect cast led by John Astin and Carolyn Jones.
Switching up our visits to the two Columbias could end up being a big move. I like the idea of playing South Carolina later in the year and I predict lots of tears out of the Columbia to our east should this schedule change actually occur.
During my manic years I experienced creativity in all aspects of my life; both in my jobs and any craft I was attempting at the time. I self taught myself to paint in oil on canvas; learned to mosaic, again self taught; learned to sew on a sewing machine with no instructions ~ well you get the picture. The manic part of bipolar (or the lesser hypomania) is what we miss once we are in control of our disease. Our accelerator, when under control is running at a smooth pace, i.e., no racing thoughts; but with that loss of speed there is a loss of creativity as well. Wikipedia has a wonderful article on the disease.
I never saw her again and none of us ever had to dodge the eraser-bullet again either.
Without sifting and in drinking, what am I choosing to be – the sand or the salt or the sugar?
An open chakra helps us enter into the realm of faith, an understanding that needs no justification or explanation. We become one with the Universe and feel connected to the “Divine Spirit”. “Our focus shifts from survival to one of infinite possibility”. Pg 210
3) Rocket blows up.
We are going to try to finish up all the bread items in the house this next week and ease into and and start hard-core next Monday. I hope I don't chicken-out!
Relaxing the rest of the day and hoping to work more on the new school room this weekend.
Baby Guy wore out just from watching his oldest sister’s hard work. Yes, this is a completely gratuitous photo of a sleeping baby.
